 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















Empowering | Innovation




Discover how our Prime Brokerage Solutions can help you operate more efficiently — and more profitably.


OUR SOLUTIONS




Are we the right partner for you?
Wondering if your firm is a good fit with Apex? Take our Client Compatibility Quiz and find out.


TAKE COMPATIBILITY QUIZ




Why Apex
Discover why our proven expertise in clearing and execution, combined with our flexible technology, makes us the perfect partner to solve your sophisticated challenges to help you grow your business.






Customer Service




Flexible Technology




Stability




Robust Product & Solutions

 




Independence




Risk Management




Value

 


LEARN MORE


Our Leaders

MEET THE TEAM



















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 







































 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















Thanks for contacting Apex. Send us a message below and an Apex representative will get back to you within one business day. If you want to talk to someone sooner, give us a call at one of the numbers below.

















 Topic*
---Prime Brokerage SalesInstitutional SalesRetail SalesClient ServicesHuman ResourcesOther


First Name *



Last Name *



Your Email *



Phone Number *



Company *



How did you hear about us?




 Your Message*
 









Headquarters
One Dallas Center
350 N. St. Paul Street
Suite 1300
Dallas, TX 75201
214-765-1100
Prime Brokerage &Institutional Sales:
214-765-1540
Retail Sales:
214-765-1010
Client Support:
214-765-1009
 


















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 




































 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















Why Apex?




Empowering Innovation. Empowering Growth.
We’re a rare breed. We’re a proven leader in the clearing space, led by a leadership team who brings over 150 years of combined experience in the space. That experience is combined with a relentless focus on our customers, an ability to anticipate industry trends, and a sophisticated suite of forward-thinking technology-driven solutions. This powerful combination enables us to work together in a highly consultative way, perfectly aligned to help you solve your most challenging business problems. Ultimately, our goal is to empower your innovation.
With Apex, you’ll get: 

A focus on you and your needs.
We have one goal — to help you reach your goals. Our experts are with you every step of the way to recommend solutions to help you solve your business challenges. 
Fully integrated, leading-edge technology.
Our industry-leading Apex ConnectTM solution provides a powerful suite of APIs for your business. This highly flexible technology solution integrates seamlessly with your infrastructure.
 

Strong, stable, self-clearing broker dealer.
We’re not a bank, so we’re not subject to the taxing overhead of those regulations. This means we can deliver a very predictable capital cushion, mitigating the need to drop clients unexpectedly as a result of regulatory overhead.
Proactive, proprietary risk management.
Our industry-leading Apex RiskCheckTM solution is one-of-a-kind. This proprietary, multi-dimensional approach to managing risk is integrated across every aspect of our business. At Apex, we proactively monitor all aspects of our business, and our clients’ accounts, to ensure we remain well capitalized and we protect you and your assets.
 

Pioneering solutions provider in the Fintech space.
Apex is consistently selected as the clearing firm for tech savvy, Fintech firms in the space. As a first-mover in the Fintech space, Apex has become the Custodian-of-Choice for tech-savvy firms like Betterment, Stash and other financial disrupters.
Genuine value.
In addition to proven industry expertise, robust technology solutions, and highly consultative service, you’ll even get a competitive rate structure. 
 




Apex | In the News
Read what the press has to say about how we're powering the digital revolution in financial services.


READ MORE




Looking for a Clearing Firm? Here’s what you’re looking for!
When you’re in the market for a clearing firm, there’s a lot of variables to consider. And all of them are critical to your firm’s bottom line.  It’s important that you have the facts when you’re searching for a firm.   
As you’d expect, not all clearing firms are the same. Apex is an independent, self-clearing broker, which means we can deliver greater efficiencies during every phase of the process. Our proven expertise, cutting-edge technology solutions, and highly consultative approach will help drive bottom line impact for your business.
We believe educated clients are our best partners.  So we’ve created a comprehensive checklist of the key elements you should seek in your clearing firm:



 Business focus.



Is clearing their primary focus?   Or, are they part of a larger business where clearing is only one aspect of their business and trying to be a lot of things to a lot of firms?
Why we’re different: Our core focus is clearing, which is why we’re a leader in the space. 



 Self-clearing.



Are they clearing through another firm, making them a pricey middleman? 
Why we’re different: Apex is a self-clearing broker-dealer, enabling us to have complete control over the entire process, creating more efficiencies, transparency, and faster throughput. 



 Stability.



How big are they? How small are they? Keep in mind — bigger is not always better. It’s not uncommon for larger firms to “fire” unprofitable clients.
Why we’re different: Leveraging our Apex RiskCheckTM solution, we take a disciplined, responsible approach to financial health ensuring we’re well capitalized and can partner with clients of all sizes. We’re stable with a strong financial position. 



 Client Support.



It’s one thing to say they have it, but it’s quite another to actually be good at it. The question is — will they actually respond in a timely fashion? 
Why we’re different: With Apex AssistTM you’ll have a dedicated account representative and a team of client service specialists who are responsible for ensuring your needs are met in a timely fashion. 



 Technology Solutions.



How technologically savvy are they? Do you have to fit into their antiquated and inflexible platform or will they develop a custom solution for you?
Why we’re different: Apex ConnectTM is an industry leading flexible, scalable suite of APIs and sophisticated technology-driven solutions designed to integrate seamlessly with your infrastructure. 



 Products.



Does the firm have relevant, useful products that solve a genuine need — and that you can understand? 
Why we’re different: Apex has developed a suite of products, like Apex ConnectTM, Apex AssistTM, and Apex QuickStartTM, that offer tangible benefits and deliver real benefits to your business.  Our products are designed to communicate benefits in a simple, easy to understand, down-to-earth kind of way.



 Value.



You get what you pay for. If a clearing partner is cheap, then most likely their service, technology, and solutions are cheap too. Conversely, just because a firm charges a lot doesn’t mean they’re better. You want a good value for what you’re getting. 
Why we’re different: Apex delivers competitive rates combined with significant value throughout the entire clearing lifecycle:  paperless onboarding, industry-leading technology, high-touch consultative service, and a leadership team with significant industry expertise.





Are we the right partner for you?
Wondering if your firm is a good fit with Apex? Take our Client Compatibility Quiz and find out.


TAKE COMPATIBILITY QUIZ



A Disciplined Approach to Safety, Security and Stability
For a lot of clearing firms, risk management is nothing more than a bullet on a list of offerings. For us, it’s foundational to how we operate. It’s part of who we are and how we operate —  it’s part of our DNA, and why we developed Apex RiskCheckTM.
Apex RiskCheckTM, is a proprietary, 5 tiered approach to risk that ensures all aspects of our business protects your assets and your business. As an Apex client, we know you put your trust in our ability to protect you, your customers, and your business. We take that seriously. Which is why managing risk permeates everything we do as a firm. 
When it comes to finding a clearing firm who can effectively manage risk and protect its clients — bigger isn’t necessarily better. As an independent, self-clearing broker dealer, our size is actually one of our core strengths. Because we’re not a bank, we’re not subject to the taxing overhead and regulations as other firms. And because we’re privately held, we’re not beholden to external shareholders. This means we’ve got the ability to manage our finances in a highly disciplined way, to meet the needs of our clients, and manage our capital in a highly efficient way. Ultimately, this disciplined and fiscally responsible approach ensures a strong financial position that keeps us well capitalized to provide a predictable capital cushion for you and your customers.
>
 Real-Time Risk Monitoring
We proactively monitor client trading activity through our sophisticated risk tools to prevent negative impacts to other clients.


>
 Portfolio Stress Tests
Our risk team strenuously tests client portfolios to flag potential risk scenarios before they happen.


>
 Compliance & Regulatory Checks
Our compliance team continually checks for regulatory red flags to help you operate in compliance and prevent missteps that will cost your business.


>
 New Client Evaluation Process
We have a vigorous client review process that ensures we only partner with clients who won’t put our firm or our clients at risk.


>
 Strong Financial Management
We manage our balance sheet to ensure we are well capitalized and able to provide a stable and predictable capital cushion.




Our Leaders

MEET THE TEAM


















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 




































 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















Careers




Working at Apex
Apex is recognized as a leader in clearing and execution thanks to our forward-thinking, client-focused solutions that empower innovation for our clients. Through a unique combination of proven expertise and sophisticated technology, we partner with financial firms to help them be more innovative, efficient, and profitable. 
The key to our success is our people. In every Apex office you’ll find passionate, committed, dedicated teams driven to find smart solutions to solve our clients’ challenges. Which is why we’re always looking for bold, collaborative, problem solvers to help us continue to thrive.
At Apex, you’ll have real opportunities to impact our business and be an integral part of the team. We place a high value on big thinking and new ideas so your voice will be heard at Apex. And you’ll be surrounded by people with the same level of passion for bold ideas and working together to find smarter solutions. 
We provide great flexibility and work-life balance, a collaborative, open work space, and real potential to grow with the firm. Sound like the place for you? Join us and be a part of something amazing.



VIEW ALL OPEN POSITIONS




Our Values





Be Collaborative & Respectful



Innovate & Be Impactful



Put the Client First & Do Amazing Work

 



Act Boldly & With Courage



Be Diligent & Financially Responsible



Operate Ethically & With Integrity

 




Our Benefits
In addition to a casual work environment, Apex offers the competitive benefits package you’d expect from a leader, which include health, dental, vision, life, disability insurance, and 401(k). Our employees also enjoy extra benefits and perks, such as:



>
 Health Care & Dependent Care


>
 Commuter Benefit Program


>
 Tuition Reimbursement


>
 Adoption Assistance


>
 Sabbatical Program


>
 Free Soft Drinks, Snacks & Coffee


>
 Full Social Calendar of Company Events





VIEW ALL OPEN POSITIONS
















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 




































 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















Our Leaders




William Capuzzi | Chief Executive Officer
William Brennan | Chief Financial Officer
Chris Fesler | Chief Technology Officer
Sarah Dahl-Klement | Chief People Officer
 



John Mollica | Head of Institutional
Ron Fiske | Head of Retail
Sam McIngvale | Head of Retail Innovation
 
 


 


  Apex Strategic Advisors




Brad Goldberg
George Ruhana
Brian Duggan
 


















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 




































 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















FINRA Rules



Margin Disclosure Statement – FINRA Rule 2264
We are furnishing this document to provide you with basic facts about purchasing securities on margin, and to alert you to the risks involved with trading securities in a margin account. Before trading in a margin account, you should carefully review the margin agreement provided by your broker. Consult your broker regarding any questions or concerns you may have with your margin accounts.
When you purchase securities, you may pay for the securities in full or you may borrow part of the purchase price from your brokerage firm. If you choose to borrow funds from your firm, you will open a margin account with the firm. The securities purchased are the firm’s collateral for the loan to you. If the securities in your account decline in value, so does the value of the collateral supporting your loan, and as a result, the firm can take action, such as issue a margin call and/or sell securities in your account, in order to maintain the required equity in the account.
It is important that you fully understand the risks involved in trading securities on margin. These risks include the following:
You can lose more funds than you deposit in the margin account. A decline in the value of securities that are purchased on margin may require you to provide additional funds to the firm that has made the loan to avoid the forced sale of those securities or other securities in your account.
The firm can force the sale of securities in your account. If the equity in your account falls below the maintenance margin requirements under the law, or the firm’s higher “house” requirements, the firm can sell the securities in your account to cover the margin deficiency. You also will be responsible for any shortfall in the account after such a sale.
The firm can sell your securities without contacting you. Some investors mistakenly believe that a firm must contact them for a margin call to be valid, and that the firm cannot liquidate securities in their accounts to meet the call unless the firm has contacted them first. This is not the case. Most firms will attempt to notify their customers of margin calls, but they are not required to do so. However, even if a firm has contacted a customer and provided a specific date by which the customer can meet a margin call, the firm can still take necessary steps to protect its financial interest, including immediately selling the securities without notice to the customer.
You are not entitled to choose which security in your margin account is liquidated or sold to meet a margin call. Because the securities are collateral for the margin loan, the firm has the right to decide which security to sell in order to protect its interests.
The firm can increase its “house” maintenance margin requirement at any time and is not required to provide you advance written notice. These changes in firm policy often take effect immediately and may result in the issuance of a maintenance margin call. Your failure to satisfy the call may cause the member to liquidate or sell securities in your account.
You are not entitled to an extension of time on a margin call. While an extension of time to meet margin requirements may be available to customers under certain conditions, a customer does not have a right to the extension.
The IRS requires Broker Dealers to treat dividend payments on loaned securities positions as a “substitute payment” in lieu of a dividend. A substitute payment is not, a “qualified dividend” and is not taxed as ordinary income.
Industry regulations may limit, in whole or in part, your ability to exercise voting rights of securities that have been lent or pledged to others. You may receive proxy materials indicating voting rights for a fewer number of shares than are in your account, or you may not receive any proxy materials.


Day‐Trading Risk Disclosure Statement – FINRA Rule 2270
You should consider the following points before engaging in a day‐trading strategy. For purposes of this notice, a “day trading strategy” means an overall trading strategy characterized by the regular transmission by a customer of intra‐day orders to effect both purchase and sale transactions in the same security or securities.
Day trading can be extremely risky. Day trading, generally, is not appropriate for someone of limited resources and limited investment or trading experience and low risk tolerance. You should be prepared to lose all of the funds that you use for day trading. In particular, you should not fund day‐trading activities with retirement savings, student loans, second mortgages, emergency funds, funds set aside for purposes such as education or home ownership or funds required to meet your living expenses. Further, certain evidence indicates that an investment of less than $50,000 will significantly impair the ability of a day trader to make a profit. Of course, an investment of $50,000 or more in no way guarantees success.
Be cautious of claims of large profits from day trading. You should be wary of advertisements or other statements that emphasize the potential for large profits as a result of day trading. Day trading can lead to large and immediate financial losses.
Day trading requires knowledge of securities markets. Day trading requires in‐depth knowledge of the securities markets and trading techniques and strategies. In attempting to profit through day trading, you must compete with professional, licensed traders employed by securities firms. You should have appropriate experience before engaging in day trading.
Day trading requires knowledge of a firm’s operations. You should be familiar with a securities firm’s business practices, including the operation of the firm’s order execution systems and procedures. Under certain market conditions, you may find it difficult or impossible to liquidate a position quickly at a reasonable price. This can occur, for example, when the market for a stock suddenly drops, or if trading is halted due to recent news events or unusual trading activity. The more volatile a stock is, the greater the likelihood that problems may be encountered in executing a transaction. In addition to normal market risks, you may experience losses due to system failures.
Day trading will generate substantial commissions, even if the per trade cost is low. Day trading involves aggressive trading, and generally you will pay commissions on each trade. The total daily commissions that you pay on your trades will add to your losses or significantly reduce your earnings. For instance, assuming that a trade costs $16 and an average of 29 transactions are conducted per day, an investor would need to generate an annual profit of $111,360 just to cover commission expenses.
Day trading on margin or short selling may result in losses beyond your initial investment. When you day trade with funds borrowed from a firm or someone else, you can lose more than the funds you originally placed at risk. A decline in the value of the securities that are purchased may require you to provide additional funds to the firm to avoid the forced sale of those securities or other securities in your account. Short selling as part of your day trading strategy also may lead to extraordinary losses, because you may have to purchase a stock at a very high price in order to cover a short position.
Potential Registration Requirements. Persons providing investment advice for others or managing securities account for others may need to register as either an “Investment Advisor” under the Investment Advisors Act of 1940 or as a “Broker” or “Dealer” under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Such activities may also trigger state registration requirement.


Business Continuity Plan: FINRA Rule 4370 
As a fully disclosed and omnibus clearing firm, we have developed a Disaster Recovery (“D/R”) Plan to ensure business continuity. In our capacity as clearing firm, we provide a variety of services that require the provision of continual technological and operational support to your broker. In connection with accomplishing business continuity, we have established a remote independent D/R Site as a major component of our D/R Plan. This Site has resources in place to operate and maintain business critical processes in the event that our headquarters in Dallas, Texas cannot be occupied due to anything from a natural disaster to a terrorist attack, whether or not such an event affects only our firm or is more regional in scope. The D/R Plan contemplates restoration of critical processes within a twenty‐four hour time span. Please note that the specifics of our D/R Plan are subject to modification. You may obtain a copy of our most current D/R Plan by submitting your request via email to info@apexclearing.com.


SIPC Information – FINRA Rule 2266
As a member of the Securities Investor Protection Corporation (SIPC), funds are available to meet customer claims up to a ceiling of $500,000, including a maximum of $250,000 for cash claims. For additional information regarding SIPC coverage, including a brochure, please contact SIPC at (202) 371‐8300 or visit www.sipc.org.


Investor Education and Protection – FINRA Rule 2267
NASD Rule 2280 requires Apex Clearing Corporation to provide information about FINRA’s BrokerCheck program. An investor brochure that includes information describing the BrokerCheck program may be obtained from FINRA. The FINRA BrokerCheck hotline number is (800) 289‐9999. The FINRA web site address is www.FINRA.org.


Carrying Agreements – FINRA Rule 4311 
The firm with which you have opened your securities account has retained Apex Clearing Corporation (Apex) to provide certain record keeping or operational services. These services such as the execution and settlement of securities transactions, custody of securities and cash balances, and extension of credit on margin transactions are provided under a fully disclosed Clearing Agreement between Apex and your firm. As a member of FINRA, Apex is required (under NASD Rule 3230 and NYSE Rule 382) to disclose to you the details of our fully disclosed Clearing Agreement with your firm, which are summarized below.


Extended Hours Trading Risk Disclosure: FINRA Rule 2265
• Risk of Lower
Liquidity Liquidity refers to the ability of market participants to buy and sell securities. Generally, the more orders that are available in a market, the greater the liquidity. Liquidity is important because with greater liquidity it is easier for investors to buy or sell securities, and as a result, investors are more likely to pay or receive a competitive price for securities purchased or sold. There may be lower levels of liquidity in extended hours trading as compared to regular market hours. As a result, your order may only be partially executed, or not at all.
• Risk of Higher Volatility
Volatility refers to the changes in price that securities undergo when trading. Generally, the higher the volatility of a security, the greater its price swings. There may be greater levels of volatility in extended hours trading than in regular market hours. As a result, your order may only be partially executed, or not at all, or you may receive an inferior price in extended hours trading to what you might receive during regular market hours.
• Risk of Changing Prices
The prices of securities traded in extended hours trading may not reflect the prices either at the end of regular market hours, or upon the opening of the next morning. As a result, you may receive an inferior price in extended hours trading to what you might receive during regular market hours.
• Risk of Unlinked Markets
Depending on the extended hours trading system or the time of day, the prices displayed on a particular extended hour’s system may not reflect the prices on other concurrently operating extended hours trading systems dealing in the same securities. Accordingly, you may receive an inferior price on one extended hours trading system than you might receive on another extended hours trading system.
• Risk of News Announcements
Normally, issuers release news announcements that may affect the price of their securities after regular market hours. Similarly, important financial information is frequently announced outside of regular market hours. In extended hours trading, these announcements may occur during trading, and if combined with lower liquidity and higher volatility, may cause an exaggerated and unsustainable effect on the price of a security.
• Risk of Wider Spreads
The spread refers to the difference in price between what you can buy a security for and what you can sell it for. Lower liquidity and higher volatility in extended hours trading may result in wider than normal spreads for a particular security.
• Risk of Lack of Calculation or Dissemination of Underlying Index Value or Intraday IndicativeValue (“IIV”)
For certain Derivative Securities Products, an updated underlying index value, or IIV, may not be calculated or publicly disseminated in extended trading hours. Since the underlying index value and IIV are not calculated or widely disseminated during the pre‐market and post‐market sessions an investor who is unable to calculate implied values for certain Derivative Securities Products in those sessions may be at a disadvantage to market professionals.


Callable Securities – FINRA Rule 4340
Once a security is deemed callable (callable security) by the issuer, DTC or the custodian will notify Apex of the call and we will implement a random lottery call process, based on client account eligibility. Eligibility for the random lottery process is based on the securities call classification of ‘favorable redemption call’ or ‘unfavorable redemption call’. The term favorable or unfavorable is based on a comparison between the call price and the market price. When the comparison between the call price and market price are beneficial to the client, the call is deemed favorable. Favorable redemption calls will exclude any account in which Apex or its associated persons have an interest until all other customers’ positions in such securities have been satisfied.
An unfavorable redemption call is when the comparison between the call price and market price are not as beneficial to the client and therefore deemed unfavorable. Apex will not exclude its positions or those of its associated persons (including those persons performing solely clerical and ministerial functions) from the pool of any securities deemed unfavorable and eligible to be called.
A determination will be made as to which redemption call the security is subject to (favorable or unfavorable) prior to commencement of the lottery process.
Once the terms of the call have been determined and eligible accounts have been selected, the random lottery process will occur to select accounts for the partial call redemption. A random start and jump number is executed at the beginning of the lottery to ensure the process is impartial, fair and consistent with the call allocation. When the redemption call has ended for each security, Apex is notified of the called account by its vendor and will inform the Introducing Broker (IB) who will notify the customer of the account status.



BACK TO BUSINESS CONTINUITY PLAN & OTHER DISCLOSURES >>

















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 




































 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















Emergency



Apex Business Interruption Website
Apex will activate emergency procedures when the company believes it is in the best interest of its customers and employees.
In the event of a business interruption that requires relocation from the 350 N. St. Paul building:

You will be contacted by your manager or director
Designated personnel will have access to Apex’s Business Continuity Plans
Watch TV Station WFAA-TV (Channel 8) for closing information

Phone Numbers for General Information Only

An automated message will provide general information regarding the nature of the business interruption.
This information will be updated every two hours to keep you apprised of the situation and to notify you as to the appropriate response.
The designated phone number to call to obtain the programmed information is: (214) 953-3500

Inbound Call Numbers & Emergency Email Address

Apex’s main number, its 800 numbers, as well as selected departments phone numbers, will be ‘ported’ over to new numbers.
Managers must advise correspondents and customers of their telephone numbers at the business recovery site.
An emergency message center will be created to accept calls and email from customers and staff for those numbers that have not been transferred to the new telephone system.
This phone number and email site will be manned 24 hours a day, 7 days a week during a business interruption:(214) 765-1100 businessrecovery@apexclearing.com

Help Desk Access

Like the inbound call center, the help desk will be staffed 24 hours a day, 7 days a week during a business interruption.
The help desk will service the business recovery sites and assist those working from home.
The Help Desk can be reached by e-mail (helpdesk@apexclearing.com) or by phone (214) 765-1001

Faxing Information

The Apex Business Recovery site will continue to process both inbound and outbound faxes.

Business Continuity Plans
Apex Clearing Business Continuity Plan

Apex employees with the appropriate clearance can access their individual business resumption plans by entering their username and secure password.
As a part of Apex’s ongoing commitment to maintaining security of its customers and employees, business continuity plans have been developed for each department within the company. The above link will also take you to employee’s home, cell and other contact numbers. These plans and phone numbers are accessible only to those with the appropriate security clearance.

Remote Access
In many cases, employees will work from home or from a remote site other than the Apex Recovery Site. Apex employees have several options when it comes to remote access. All of these options call for the user to have an internet connection from a remote site.
VPN

https://vpn.apexclearing.com
Enter username and password.

Webmail

https://webmail.apexclearing.com/owa
Enter email address for username and password


















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 




































 

Apex Clearing | Empowering Innovation.


























































































 



 




Contact Us
Log In


















Retail Solutions



Delivering Solutions that Empower Innovation
As a leader in clearing & execution, we have proven expertise helping retail firms of all shapes and sizes achieve their business goals. Our approach is quite simple (and quite refreshing). Where other firms force you into a one-size-fits-all solution, we work with you to identify the right Apex solutions that will empower innovation and drive growth within your business. We offer a range of powerful product solutions that will deliver a better experience for your customer, dramatically improve efficiencies across your business, and help you achieve real growth. 
Experience how we can enable innovation and growth in your firm. 




Apex Digital Solutions for RIA & Digital Advisors
We’re leveraging our proven ability to solve complex Fintech problems to reimagine digital advice solutions for RIAs.



SEE OUR SOLUTIONS




Apex Solutions for Fintech Firms
Apex has become the firm of choice for tech-savvy Fintech firms. See how we can help you realize your vision.



SEE OUR SOLUTIONS





Apex Solutions for Online Broker-Dealers
We offer Online Broker Dealers a compelling mix of innovative technology, exceptional risk management, and high-touch client support all at competitive pricing.



SEE OUR SOLUTIONS




Apex Solutions for Full-Service Firms
We have the end-to-end solutions you need to operate your business more efficiently, and deliver more profitability.



SEE OUR SOLUTIONS




Apex Products & Solutions for Retail





QUICKLY AND EFFORTLESSLY CONNECT TO OUR POWERFUL TECHNOLOGY.
Apex ConnectTM is a comprehensive suite of powerful APIs that seamlessly connect your infrastructure to our powerful, back-end processing technology. With Apex Connect, our APIs create a seamless, fully-automated solution that gives your customers complete control over their account management needs, with virtually no manual oversight by your team. Apex Connect automates the day-to- day functions, to let you focus on operating and growing your business.







ENABLE YOUR CUSTOMERS TO OPEN ACCOUNTS INSTANTLY.
Apex PaperlessTM technology allows customers to open their account instantly on any device with absolutely no paper. All of the account opening, verification, assignment, and establishment functions are handled digitally so your customers can begin trading the second they’re ready. With Apex Paperless, you’ll open accounts faster and get more customers trading sooner.






GIVE YOUR CUSTOMERS THE POWER TO MANAGE THEIR MONEY QUICKLY AND EASILY.
Our Apex TransferTM technology seamlessly and instantly verifies and quickly processes all cash management functions including ACH, wire, and checks as well as ACATs. Customers have complete control over their cash management needs without any processing delays giving them faster access to assets and minimizing the time you spend processing requests.







ALL THE TOOLS AND RESOURCES YOU NEED TO GET STARTED QUICKLY.
In this business, time is literally money. That’s why we created Apex QuickstartTM — a proprietary solution designed to quickly and efficiently integrate our technology with your systems to get you up and running as fast as possible. Our QuickStart process includes dedicated project managers and technology resources to guide the process, as well as comprehensive documentation and a fully-functioning test environment to give your tech teams complete transparency into the integration.






DEDICATED TEAMS FOCUSED ON HELPING YOU ACHIEVE YOUR GOALS. 
Apex AssistTM delivers a dedicated account representative who knows your business, the industry and how to solve your challenges. With Apex Assist, you also have a team of client support experts on call and ready to solve any problem. And because our team knows your business inside and out, we’ll make sure you’re taking full advantage of the tools & technology that will increase efficiencies and maximize your profitability.


















 
© 2017 Apex Clearing Corporation
Member of FINRA, NYSE, SIPC.
 








 






































Apex Clearing




BBB Business Profile | Apex Clearing Corporation | Accreditation





















Home
 > 
Business Directory
 > 
Computers Hardware, Software & Services
 > 
Apex Clearing Corporation














This Business Is Not BBB Accredited






Apex Clearing Corporation



Submit a Review

































Apex Clearing Corporation






            Business Information
        






(214) 765-1542

Apex Clearing Corporation
5 years in business

        350 N Saint Paul St STE 1300
        Dallas, TX 75201-4240
    




                 WEBSITE
            





                    Additional Phone Numbers
                


                            (214) 765-1100
                        





See Less Contact Options
See More Contact Options





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 04/21/2014
            

                Business Started: 06/06/2012


                Business Started Locally: 06/06/2012
            




            Type of Entity
             
            Corporation       
    



            Business Management
        


                    William Capuzzi, CEO | President
                

                    Brian Glover, Chief Compliance Officer
                






            Business Category
        


                Computers Hardware, Software & Services
            




                            Financial Services
                        




See More Business Categories
See Less Business Categories









 







BBB Accreditation





                This Business Is Not BBB Accredited
            

                
                Businesses are under no obligation to seek BBB accreditation, and some businesses are not accredited because they have not sought BBB accreditation.
            

                To be accredited by BBB, a business must apply for accreditation and BBB must determine that the business meets
                BBB accreditation standards, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses must pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Apex Clearing Corporation






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        






This Business Is Not BBB Accredited  

                Apex Clearing Corporation
            










A-




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    



100%




[1] Positive Reviews



[0] Neutral Reviews



[0] Negative Reviews



[1] Total Customer Reviews
                        





[6] Total Customer Complaints
                        










Composite Score:





                        Apex Clearing Corporation has received 4.55 out of 5 stars based on 1 Customer Reviews and a BBB Rating of A-.
                        






                            Comprised of 67% BBB Rating and 33% Customer Review Rating.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business. The Customer Review
                            Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive, neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                        

                            The BBB letter grade represents the BBB's opinion of how the business is likely to interact with its customers.
                            The BBB grade is based on BBB file information about the business.
                            In some cases, a business' grade may be lowered if the BBB does not have sufficient
                            information about the business despite BBB's requests for that information from the business.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating plus the BBB Rating is not a guarantee of a business'
                            reliability or performance. BBB recommends that consumers consider a business'
                            BBB Rating and Customer Review Rating in addition to all other available information
                            about the business.
                        














Share your experience


Submit a Review


Submit a Complaint












Share




Print






































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 






















 

















BBB Search Database of Businesses, Charities, & News Items

















 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











No results found.   Ask BBB to develop a report on this business by clicking here.


BBB Search Tips
Use BBB's search bar above to check out businesses and charities from our comprehensive database of BBB Business Profiles. Enter any of the following into the search box:

Business or Charity Name
Website URL
Phone Number
Email Address

Or, select from the categories in the drop-list to search by Type of Business or Type of Charity.
Want to know more about our rating system? Find out more here. 
Need more info?  Try the search FAQs.













































Apex Clearing Company Profile | Financial Information, Competitors and ExecutivesCATEGORIESCITIESSign InFind Companies > Apex ClearingApex ClearingcbEDITcbLocationDallas, TXRevenue$35mTotal Funding$–Founded2012Employees310StageprivateCompany Websiteapexclearing.com/LinkedInlinkedin.com/Apex ClearingApex Clearing Corporation is an innovator in clearing, custody, execution, and
technology. They specialize in supporting a variety of financial institutions
including broker-dealers, proprietary trading firms, retail brokerages, and
financial technology startups. Their clearing and technology services power the
most cutting-edge financial firms in the industry, and our innovative approach
to back office solutions enables businesses to grow and succeed. Apex prides
itself on thinking differently...  read more and tirelessly working towards the further
evolution of financial services and what they can do for our clients. Apex
Clearing Corporation is registered with the SEC, a member of FINRA, and a
participant in SIPCKeywordsfinancial services,financeApex Clearing CompetitorsMarsh & McLennan Companies, Inc.A global professional services firm that brings together the unique...THL CreditTHL Credit is a specialized high yield credit manager responsible for...AATPSee 2 more with a free trialRecent News from Apex ClearingStart trial to view recent news about Apex Clearing.Request trialBusiness Data in your WorkflowSave time and work smarter with fresh data on companies, leads, and contactsLearn about DataFox APIs and Data324 5th Street 
San Francisco, CA 94107 (415) 969-2144info@datafox.comLinkedInTwitterDataFoxProductWho Benefits?CustomersCompanyBlogLearn MoreAccount-based MarketingSales Prospecting TipsSales Operations StrategyFastest-Growing Tech Companies By RegionTourSalesforce IntegrationSlack IntegrationChrome ExtensionDataFox APISupportEmail UsHelp CenterPrivacy PolicyTerms of Service

Apex Clearing Forms On-Demand








Apex Clearing FormsOn-Demand


Home | 
Contact Us | 
Login






All inquires relative to this site (special requests or other general questions) should be directed to:

Product Launch

E-mail: Apex-ClientServices@apexclearing.com

Apex Clearing Corporation
350 N. St. Paul, Ste 1300
Dallas, TX  75201




�2008 

Home | 
Contact Us | 
Login






Apex Clearing Corporation: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 25, 2017 3:16 PM ET
Consumer Finance

Company Overview of Apex Clearing Corporation



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Apex Clearing Corporation provides clearing and execution solutions to the financial services industry. It offers clearing services in the areas of purchase and sales, settlements, new account setup, corporate actions processing, banking and cash management, and margins; and execution services in the areas of retail best execution smart router, dark pool aggregator, direct market access, and institutional trading. The company also provides portfolio financing services and solutions, such as portfolio margin and joint back office solutions; and prime brokerage services. In addition, it offers relationship management services; and risk management services in the areas of pre-trade risk filters...
Apex Clearing Corporation provides clearing and execution solutions to the financial services industry. It offers clearing services in the areas of purchase and sales, settlements, new account setup, corporate actions processing, banking and cash management, and margins; and execution services in the areas of retail best execution smart router, dark pool aggregator, direct market access, and institutional trading. The company also provides portfolio financing services and solutions, such as portfolio margin and joint back office solutions; and prime brokerage services. In addition, it offers relationship management services; and risk management services in the areas of pre-trade risk filters and controls, proprietary real-time risk monitoring system, trade surveillance monitoring, AML systems and alerts, fixed income TRACE reports, best execution, and OATS reporting services. The company serves online broker dealers; entrepreneurial, financial technology companies, and proprietary trading groups; established, and nationally recognized broker dealers and wealth management companies. Apex Clearing Corporation was formerly known as Ridge Clearing & Outsourcing Solutions, Inc. and changed its name to Apex Clearing Corporation in June 2012. The company was incorporated in 1978 and is based in Dallas, Texas. As of June 5, 2012, Apex Clearing Corporation operates as a subsidiary of Apex Clearing Solutions, LLC.
Detailed Description


350 North Saint Paul StreetOne Dallas CenterSuite 1300Dallas, TX 75201United StatesFounded in 1978



Phone: 214-765-1100

Fax: 888-268-6916

www.apexclearing.com







Key Executives for Apex Clearing Corporation




Mr. William Capuzzi


      	Chief Executive Officer and Director
      








Mr. Peter Lawler


      	President, CRO and Director
      








Mr. John Kenny


      	Chief Operating Officer
      








Mr. Jud Pyle CFA


      	Chief Capital Markets Officer
      








Mr. Ronald Fiske


      	Head of Retail
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Apex Clearing Corporation Key Developments

Apex Clearing Corporation Names Ron Fiske as Head of Retail
Jan 31 17
Apex Clearing Corporation has hired Ron Fiske as Head of Retail.  Mr. Fiske brings to Apex more than 30 years of financial experience, with an expertise in custody, and will play a pivotal role in deepening the company’s digital investment solutions. Prior to joining Apex, Mr. Fiske was managing director at Envestnet. He has also held managerial positions at Fidelity Investments and Pershing LLC.


Apex Clearing Launches Prime Brokerage Platform to Serve Growing Demand from Small and Mid-Sized Hedge Funds
Oct 10 16
Apex Clearing Corporation announced that it has launched its Apex Prime brokerage offering for hedge funds with up to $200 million in assets under management. Apex Clearing has put together a veteran team headed by former Convergex executive John Mollica and has added former Goldman Sachs executive Brian Duggan as a strategic advisor to the business.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 1031 Corp. United States 1800Pay, Inc. United States 1st Franklin Financial Corporation United States 2011-SIP-2 Venture, LLC United States 2262011 Ontario-Delaware Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Apex Clearing Corporation, please visit www.apexclearing.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Wire Funds to Your Investing Account - Firstrade Securities Inc.




































 





Search





Live Support
Open an Account






LOGIN



Forgot Password?

Select Start Page
Home
Balances
Positions
Stock & ETF Trading
Option Trading
Order Status
Account History












HOME 

About Firstrade
Products & Services
Premier Services
Pricing
International Accounts

Promotions
Switch to Firstrade



ACCOUNTS

Balances
Positions
Realized Gain/Loss
History
Profile
E-Docs
Deposit/Withdraw
Tax Center



TRADING

Dashboard
Quick Bar
Stocks/ETFs
Options
Mutual Funds
Fixed Income
Mobile
Extended Hours Trading



RESEARCH & TOOLS

Market & News
Stocks Reports
Mutual Funds
Alerts
Firstrade Navigator
Real-time Streaming Watchlist
Options Wizard



RETIREMENT

Individual Retirement Accounts
Business Planning
Education Planning
Personal Finance



EDUCATION

Stocks
Options
ETFs
Mutual Funds
Fixed Income
Margin Loans
Glossary
Upcoming IPOs



SERVICE

Contact Us
Fund Your Account
FAQs
Form Center
Online Security
Sitemap








Fund Your Account











ELECTRONIC FUNDING
CHECK
WIRE FUNDS TO FIRSTRADE
ACCOUNT TRANSFER



WIRE FUNDS INTO YOUR FIRSTRADE ACCOUNT
VIEWS:

Domestic
 | 
International

From a Domestic U.S. Bank



PLEASE PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO THE SENDING INSTITUTION:




Amount:
U.S. Dollar amount $


Bank Name:
BMO Harris Bank


Bank Address:
111 W Monroe St, Chicago, IL 60603


ABA Number:
071000288


Account Name:
Apex Clearing Corporation


Apex Clearing Address
One Dallas Center 350 N. St Paul, Suite 1300,  Dallas, TX 75201


Account Number
1617711


For Final Credit To:
Please provide your 8 digit Firstrade account number along with your full name




Important:

Incoming third-party wires will be rejected and returned.
If you are wiring funds from a bank account held jointly, please have your bank include all account holders' names as "sender".
Incoming wires received without information of "For Final Credit To" will be returned.
Funds are available immediately after receipt of the wire.
Please be advised that contribution-year coding for all IRA account wire-deposits has been defaulted to Current-Year-Contribution unless specified otherwise (prior-year); to adjust the contribution-year for wires received between Jan 1st - April 15th, please send the IRA Contribution/Adjustment Form or SIMPLE IRA Contribution/Adjustment Form to service@firstrade.com no later than May 15th of current year.




WIRE FUNDS INTO YOUR FIRSTRADE ACCOUNT
VIEWS:
Domestic 
 | 

International

From an International Bank



PLEASE PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO THE SENDING INSTITUTION:




Amount:
U.S. Dollar amount $


Bank Name:
BMO Harris Bank


Bank Address:
111 W Monroe St, Chicago, IL 60603


SWIFT CODE:
HATRUS44


Account Name:
Apex Clearing Corporation


Apex Clearing Address
One Dallas Center 350 N. St Paul, Suite 1300,  Dallas, TX 75201


Account Number
1617711


For Final Credit To:
Please provide your 8 digit Firstrade account number along with your full name




Important:

Incoming third-party wires will be rejected and returned.
If you are wiring funds from a bank account held jointly, please have your bank include all account holders' names as "sender".
Incoming wires received without information of "For Final Credit To" will be returned.
Funds are available immediately after receipt of the wire.
For international wire transfers, a fee may be charged by intermediate banks.










Promotions






Refer a Friend Bonus
Wire Fee Rebate
Transfer to Us for Free




Live Chat






	Want to speak with someone regarding basic questions in real-time?  Try our interactive live chat service.  One of our representatives can provide assistance with your inquiries. Go   

 
 







		Need Help?   U.S. Toll Free 1.800.869.8800   Overseas 1.718.961.6600   Email Us   or   Live Support   
		

OPEN AN ACCOUNT






ACCOUNTS
Fund Your Account
Transfer an Account
Trade on Margin
 
SPECIAL SERVICES
Premier Services
International Accounts
Security Lending Program
Extended Hours Trading




QUICK LINKS
Log In
Customer Service
Pricing
Promotions
Find a Form
Mobile Apps
Tax Center
Cash Management Service
1-Second Execution Guarantee
Feedback
Site Map




SECURITY
Account Protection
Online Security Center
 
BECOME A PARTNER
Affiliate Program






FOLLOW US
















CORPORATE INFORMATION
About Us    Press Room    Corporate Responsibility    Careers




LEGAL
Business Continuity    Disclosures    Order Routing Report
Privacy & Security    Terms & Conditions





		Brokerage Products and Services offered by Firstrade Securities, Inc. - Member FINRA and SIPC.
		Review Firstrade’s brokerage services with FINRA BrokerCheck.

		Online trading has inherent risk due to system response and access times that may vary due to market conditions, system performance, and other factors. An investor should understand these and additional risks before trading. Carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses before investing. All investments involve risk and losses may exceed the principal invested. Past performance of a security, industry, sector, market, or financial product does not guarantee future results or returns. Firstrade is a discount broker that provides self-directed investors with brokerage services, and does not make recommendations or offer investment, financial, legal or tax advice.
		Options trading involves risk and is not suitable for all investors. Options trading privileges are subject to Firstrade review and approval. Please review the Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options brochure before you begin trading options.
		Investors should consider the investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses of a mutual fund or ETF carefully before investing. Leveraged and Inverse ETFs may not be suitable for long-term investors and may increase exposure to volatility through the use of leverage, short sales of securities, derivatives and other complex investment strategies. A mutual fund or ETF prospectus contains this and other information and can be obtained by emailing service@firstrade.com.
		Margin trading involves interest charges and risks, including the potential to lose more than deposited or the need to deposit additional collateral in a falling market. The Margin Disclosure Statement and Agreement (PDF) is available for download, and contains information on our lending policies, interest charges, and the risks associated with margin accounts.
		*Online market and limit stock trades are $4.95 for stocks priced $1 and above. Add $0.005 per share on the entire order for stocks priced less than $1.00. Online option trades are $4.95 plus 65 cents per option contract. See our Pricing page for detailed pricing of all security types offered at Firstrade. All prices listed are subject to change without notice.
		Any specific securities, or types of securities, used as examples are for demonstration purposes only. None of the information provided should be considered a recommendation or solicitation to invest in, or liquidate, a particular security or type of security.
		This is not an offer or solicitation in any jurisdiction where Firstrade is not authorized to conduct securities
		transaction.
		System response and access times may vary due to market conditions, system performance, and other factors. 
		©2017 Firstrade Securities Inc. All rights reserved. Member FINRA/SIPC.
	

 







Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Apex-Carex Healthcare  - Swanson Health Products

































 
                                        
 
                                        
  
                                        









No
                                    Thanks



Your 10% Off Promo Code is on the Way! Thanks for signing up for emails.
You're now signed up to receive exclusive deals and savings
                                opportunities!
Thanks again for connecting with us. Keep an eye on your inbox — your first coupon
                                is on its way!

CLOSE



Thank You! This email address is already signed up

You are signed up for the following:

Offers
Recipes
E-Newsletter
Updates & Reminders

Thank you for your interest and be assured that you will continue to receive our emails at
                            this address.
Look for your next communication from us within the next week.
CLOSE



Oops!
We are having trouble processing your request.
Our apologies!
Please try again later.

CLOSE











Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products







Search Please enter an item number or keyword



All


All
Heart Health
Joint Health
Probiotics
CoQ10
Vision Health
Memory and Brain Support
Multivitamins
B Vitamins
Sleep
Weight Loss
Food & Beverage




Search









NEW Probiotics!


Swanson Brands


New Arrivals


Web Specials


Swanson Blog


Sign Up for Deals & Tips





Shop byCategory ▾
Do YouNeed Help? ▾





 Sign In or  Register







0
Your Cart ▾








0


Cart
Checkout











Probiotics


Products & Benefits


NEW Swanson Probiotics


Probiotics for Digestive Health


Probiotics for Immune System


Probiotics for Women


Probiotics for Seniors


Probiotics by Potency


Acidophilus/Lactobacillus


Reuteri


FOS (Fructooligosaccharides)


Saccharomyces Boulardii


See all Probiotics






Cleansing & Detoxification


Products & Benefits


Colon Cleanse


Charcoal


Liver Cleanse


Gastrointestinal Cleanse


Cleansing and Detoxification Herbs


Cleansing and Detoxification Tea


Whole Body Cleanse


Metal Detoxification


Urinary Cleanse


Respiratory Cleanse


See All






CoQ10


Products & Benefits


Ubiquinol


CoQ10 with Tocotrienols


CoQ10 Combination Formulas


Q-Gel


CoQ10 Chewable


CoQ10 Creams


See All






Digestive Health


Products & Benefits


Acidophilus/Probiotics


Digestive Enzymes


Digestive Health Combination Formulas


Psyllium


Ginger Root


Hydrochloric Acid (HCL)


DGL (Deglycyrrhizinated Licorice)


Pectin


Glucomannan


PepZin GI


See All






Herbs


Products & Benefits


Turmeric


Mushrooms


Pycnogenol


Milk Thistle


Tart Cherry


Cinnamon


Saw Palmetto


Black Pepper


Olive Leaf


Ginkgo Biloba


See All






Vitamin C


Products & Benefits


Vitamin C with Rose Hips


Vitamin C Combination Formulas


Bioflavonoids


Vitamin C Stress Formulas


Ester-C


Buffered Vitamin C


Vitamin C Creams and Lotions


Mineral Ascorbates


Zinc and Vitamin C Lozenges


Children's Vitamin C Formulas


See All






Women's Health


Products & Benefits


PMS and Menopause


Women's Multivitamin and Mineral Formula


Women's Acidophilus/Probiotics


Women's Leg Vein Health


Prenatal Health


Pregnancy and Breast Feeding


Tampons and Pads


Breast Health


See All






Men's Health


Products & Benefits


Prostate Health


Men's Multivitamin and Mineral Formulas


Men's Hormone Balance


Men's Hair Formulas


Men's Personal Care


See All






Enzymes


Products & Benefits


Enzyme Combination Formulas


Nattokinase


Proteolytic Enzymes


Bromelain


Papaya


Pancreatin


Legumase/Anti-Gas


Dairy/Lactose Formulas


See All






Heart


Products & Benefits


Omega-3 EFAs


Magnesium


Polyphenols/OPCs


Vitamin E


Cardiovascular Combination Formulas


Vitamin K


Resveratrol


Garlic


L-Arginine


Phytosterols


See All






Food & Beverage


Products & Benefits


Tea


Nuts and Seeds


Breakfast Foods


Honey


Oils and Vinegar


Baking


Bars


Stevia


Fruit and Vegetables


Juices


See All







					All Categories








helpdesk
					Help Deskclick here



10faq
					Top 10 FAQsclick here



needHelp
Chat8am–11pm CT Mon–Satstart chat



email
Email6am–Midnight CT Mon–Satsend message



call
Call7am–Midnight CT Mon–Sat1-800-824-4491
















Call NowTo Order!


Categories





All Categories





                                    Probiotics





NEW Swanson Probiotics
                                            






                                            Probiotics for Digestive Health






                                            Probiotics for Immune System






                                            Probiotics for Women






                                            Probiotics for Seniors






                                            Probiotics by Potency






                                            Acidophilus/Lactobacillus






                                            Reuteri






                                            FOS (Fructooligosaccharides)






                                            Saccharomyces Boulardii






                                            See all Probiotics







									Heart





											Cardiovascular Combination Formulas






                                            Magnesium






                                            Resveratrol






                                            Omega-3 EFAs






											Vitamin E






											L-Arginine






											Vitamin K
											






											D-Ribose






											L-Carnitine






											Polyphenols/OPCs






											See all Heart







				 					Joint





											Glucosamine/Chondroitin/MSM






											Joint Health Combination Formulas






											Hyaluronic Acid






											Collagen






											Glucosamine






											Tart Cherry






											Boswellia






											MSM






											SAMe






											Celadrin/Cetyl Myristoleate






											See all Joint







									CoQ10





											Ubiquinol






											CoQ10 with Tocotrienols






											CoQ10 Combination Formulas






											Q-Gel






											CoQ10 Creams






											CoQ10 Chewable






											See all CoQ10







									Vision





											Vision Health Combination Formulas






											Lutein






											Bilberry






											Zeaxanthin






											Eye Drops






											Astaxanthin






											Eyebright






											Goji Berry/Wolfberry






											Beta Carotene






											See all Vision







									Memory & Brain Support





											Memory and Brain Combination Formulas






											Phosphatidylserine (PS)






											Ginkgo Biloba






											Acetyl L-Carnitine






											Lion's Mane Mushroom






											Bacopa






											Alpha GPC






											Phosphatidylcholine






											DMAE
											






											Choline/Inositol






											See all Memory & Brain Support







									Multivitamins





											Whole Food Multivitamin






											Men's Multivitamin






											Women's Multivitamin






											Multivitamin Combination Formulas






											Senior Multivitamin






											Children's Multivitamin






                                            Prenatal Vitamins






											A, C, E, and Selenium






											Pet Multivitamin






											See all Multivitamins







									B Vitamins





											Vitamin B Complexes 






											Vitamin B-12






											Biotin






											Vitamin B-6 Pyridoxine






											Vitamin B-3 Niacin






											Folic Acid






											Inositol






											Vitamin B-15 DMG






											Brewer's Yeast






											Vitamin B-5 Pantothenic Acid






											See all B Vitamins







									Sleep





											Sleep Combination Formulas






											Melatonin






											Homeopathic Sleep Aids






											Magnesium Glycinate






											L-Tryptophan 






											Lemon Balm






											Valerian






											Sleep Aid Tea 






											Skullcap






											See all Sleep







									Weight Loss





											Garcinia Cambogia 






											Metabolism/Thermogenesis






											Apple Cider Vinegar






											Appetite Control






											Fat Absorption and Storage






											Carbohydrate Control






											7-Keto DHEA






											Weight Loss Tea






											Meal Replacements






											Lean Muscle






											See all Weight Loss







									Food & Beverage





											Tea






											Nuts and Seeds






											Breakfast Foods






											Baking






											Oils and Vinegar






											Fruit and Vegetables






											Honey






											Bars






											Stevia






											Coffee






											See all Food & Beverage







									All Categories








							Specialties
							







Cruelty Free





Vegan





Vegetarian





Organic





Gluten Free





Kosher





Non-GMO





Non-GMO Project Verified






							Brands
							





									See All Brands
									





									Swanson Brands
									





									NOW Foods
									





									Nature's Way
									





									Jarrow Formulas, Inc.
									





									Garden of Life
									





									Source Naturals
									





									Doctor's Best
									





									Enzymatic Therapy
									





									New Chapter
									





									Carlson
									





									Twinlab
									







							Web Specials





							Health Concerns
							





							New Arrivals
							







My Account

Login
or
Register















-//W3C//DTD SVG 1.1//EN" "http://www.w3.org/Graphics/SVG/1.1/DTD/svg11.dtd">












































0
Your Cart ▾








0


Cart
Checkout









Search



All


All
Heart Health
Joint Health
Probiotics
CoQ10
Vision Health
Memory and Brain Support
Multivitamins
B Vitamins
Sleep
Weight Loss
Food & Beverage












Your browser's JavaScript appears to be disabled. Please turn it back on to improve your shopping experience.





 Narrow your results:


Category


Healthy Home(3)

Medicine Cabinet(5)



Form

 Unit(5)










Apex-Carex Healthcare






					Apex-Carex Healthcare

			5 





Products 1-5 of 5Sort by: 
                
Relevance
Best Selling
Price Low to High
Price High to Low
Brand
Product Name
Top Rated
On Sale Now

Items shown: 
48
96




Refine
                



 Narrow your results:


Category


Healthy Home(3)

Medicine Cabinet(5)



Form

 Unit(5)








































    Ultra Pill Crusher
1 Unit

      In Stock                                          




                    $4.79 MSRP $9.99








15

 MSRP $9.99











														$4.79















                    $4.79



            MSRP $9.99


Swanson $4.79 

Add to Cart

 Compare

  15 
                        


































    Weekly Supplement Planner
1 Unit

      In Stock                                          




                    $4.16 MSRP $6.69








31

 MSRP $6.69











														$4.16















                    $4.16



            MSRP $6.69


Swanson $4.16 

Add to Cart

 Compare

  31 
                        


































    Copper Wrist Band
1 Unit

      In Stock                                          



                    $7.99 MSRP $9.13








 MSRP $9.13











														$7.99















                    $7.99



            MSRP $9.13


Swanson $7.99 

Add to Cart

 Compare

Write a review 
                            


































    Copper Bracelet
1 Unit

      In Stock                                          



                    $9.25 MSRP $9.31








 MSRP $9.31











														$9.25















                    $9.25



            MSRP $9.31


Swanson $9.25 

Add to Cart

 Compare

Write a review 
                            


































    Ultra Pill Splitter
1 Unit

      In Stock                                          




                    $4.99 MSRP $9.99








7

 MSRP $9.99











														$4.99















                    $4.99



            MSRP $9.99


Swanson $4.99 

Add to Cart

 Compare

  7 
                        





            Products 1-5 of 5

            Sort by: 
            
Relevance
Best Selling
Price Low to High
Price High to Low
Brand
Product Name
Top Rated
On Sale Now













Compare the Selected Items









GET OUR BEST DEALS STRAIGHT TO YOUR INBOX!


Sign Up Now















Your first offer is on the way!
You're now signed up to receive exclusive deals and savings opportunities!

Thank You! This email address is already signed up.
Thank you for your interest and be assured that you will continue to receive our emails at this address.

Oops!
We are having trouble processing your request. Our apologies! Please try again later.





					Help





					Shipping





					Returns







					Product Quality
					





					Social Responsibility
					





					Privacy & Security
					







			Customer Service
			



			About Swanson
			





Careers




International






Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products






youtube 




   






   




   



   




           





Safe Shopping Network

consumerlab


Secured by Entrust


Better Business Bureau


GMP


Stella Chat


Ratings based on results of the 2017
        ConsumerLab.com Survey of Supplement Users. More information at
        
             http://www.consumerlab.com/survey2017
        


		*These statements have not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration.
		These products are not intended to diagnose, treat, cure or prevent any disease.
	

		For our website and catalog, the MSRP is the "Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price."  The MSRP is understood to mean the price at which a manufacturer will recommend a retailer sell a product for in stores, on the internet, or in catalogs.  The MSRP of National brand items are dictated to Swanson by each manufacturer.  For Swanson brand items, the MSRP is calculated based on a varying percentage above the product's base price.
	
© 2017 Swanson Health Products – Terms of Service 







Feedback
            








































Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products


Easy Refill


Get your favorite products delivered automatically
10% off future orders of Swanson brand products in your subscription
FREE standard shipping on all future orders over $50
Control the frequency, delivery date, item quantity... or cancel at any time
Email reminders before each delivery

See all FAQs here









































































Add and Review Order


Add and Keep Shopping












Nutritional Supplements, Discount Vitamins and Herbs at Low Prices - Swanson Health Products
































 
                                        
 
                                        
  
                                        









No
                                    Thanks



Your 10% Off Promo Code is on the Way! Thanks for signing up for emails.
You're now signed up to receive exclusive deals and savings
                                opportunities!
Thanks again for connecting with us. Keep an eye on your inbox — your first coupon
                                is on its way!

CLOSE



Thank You! This email address is already signed up

You are signed up for the following:

Offers
Recipes
E-Newsletter
Updates & Reminders

Thank you for your interest and be assured that you will continue to receive our emails at
                            this address.
Look for your next communication from us within the next week.
CLOSE



Oops!
We are having trouble processing your request.
Our apologies!
Please try again later.

CLOSE











Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products







Search Please enter an item number or keyword



All


All
Heart Health
Joint Health
Probiotics
CoQ10
Vision Health
Memory and Brain Support
Multivitamins
B Vitamins
Sleep
Weight Loss
Food & Beverage




Search









NEW Probiotics!


Swanson Brands


New Arrivals


Web Specials


Swanson Blog


Sign Up for Deals & Tips





Shop byCategory ▾
Do YouNeed Help? ▾





 Sign In or  Register







0
Your Cart ▾








0


Cart
Checkout











Probiotics


Products & Benefits


NEW Swanson Probiotics


Probiotics for Digestive Health


Probiotics for Immune System


Probiotics for Women


Probiotics for Seniors


Probiotics by Potency


Acidophilus/Lactobacillus


Reuteri


FOS (Fructooligosaccharides)


Saccharomyces Boulardii


See all Probiotics






Cleansing & Detoxification


Products & Benefits


Colon Cleanse


Charcoal


Liver Cleanse


Gastrointestinal Cleanse


Cleansing and Detoxification Herbs


Cleansing and Detoxification Tea


Whole Body Cleanse


Metal Detoxification


Urinary Cleanse


Respiratory Cleanse


See All






CoQ10


Products & Benefits


Ubiquinol


CoQ10 with Tocotrienols


CoQ10 Combination Formulas


Q-Gel


CoQ10 Chewable


CoQ10 Creams


See All






Digestive Health


Products & Benefits


Acidophilus/Probiotics


Digestive Enzymes


Digestive Health Combination Formulas


Psyllium


Ginger Root


Hydrochloric Acid (HCL)


DGL (Deglycyrrhizinated Licorice)


Pectin


Glucomannan


PepZin GI


See All






Herbs


Products & Benefits


Turmeric


Mushrooms


Pycnogenol


Milk Thistle


Tart Cherry


Cinnamon


Saw Palmetto


Black Pepper


Olive Leaf


Ginkgo Biloba


See All






Vitamin C


Products & Benefits


Vitamin C with Rose Hips


Vitamin C Combination Formulas


Bioflavonoids


Vitamin C Stress Formulas


Ester-C


Buffered Vitamin C


Vitamin C Creams and Lotions


Mineral Ascorbates


Zinc and Vitamin C Lozenges


Children's Vitamin C Formulas


See All






Women's Health


Products & Benefits


PMS and Menopause


Women's Multivitamin and Mineral Formula


Women's Acidophilus/Probiotics


Women's Leg Vein Health


Prenatal Health


Pregnancy and Breast Feeding


Tampons and Pads


Breast Health


See All






Men's Health


Products & Benefits


Prostate Health


Men's Multivitamin and Mineral Formulas


Men's Hormone Balance


Men's Hair Formulas


Men's Personal Care


See All






Enzymes


Products & Benefits


Enzyme Combination Formulas


Nattokinase


Proteolytic Enzymes


Bromelain


Papaya


Pancreatin


Legumase/Anti-Gas


Dairy/Lactose Formulas


See All






Heart


Products & Benefits


Omega-3 EFAs


Magnesium


Polyphenols/OPCs


Vitamin E


Cardiovascular Combination Formulas


Vitamin K


Resveratrol


Garlic


L-Arginine


Phytosterols


See All






Food & Beverage


Products & Benefits


Tea


Nuts and Seeds


Breakfast Foods


Honey


Oils and Vinegar


Baking


Bars


Stevia


Fruit and Vegetables


Juices


See All







					All Categories








helpdesk
					Help Deskclick here



10faq
					Top 10 FAQsclick here



needHelp
Chat8am–11pm CT Mon–Satstart chat



email
Email6am–Midnight CT Mon–Satsend message



call
Call7am–Midnight CT Mon–Sat1-800-824-4491
















Call NowTo Order!


Categories





All Categories





                                    Probiotics





NEW Swanson Probiotics
                                            






                                            Probiotics for Digestive Health






                                            Probiotics for Immune System






                                            Probiotics for Women






                                            Probiotics for Seniors






                                            Probiotics by Potency






                                            Acidophilus/Lactobacillus






                                            Reuteri






                                            FOS (Fructooligosaccharides)






                                            Saccharomyces Boulardii






                                            See all Probiotics







									Heart





											Cardiovascular Combination Formulas






                                            Magnesium






                                            Resveratrol






                                            Omega-3 EFAs






											Vitamin E






											L-Arginine






											Vitamin K
											






											D-Ribose






											L-Carnitine






											Polyphenols/OPCs






											See all Heart







				 					Joint





											Glucosamine/Chondroitin/MSM






											Joint Health Combination Formulas






											Hyaluronic Acid






											Collagen






											Glucosamine






											Tart Cherry






											Boswellia






											MSM






											SAMe






											Celadrin/Cetyl Myristoleate






											See all Joint







									CoQ10





											Ubiquinol






											CoQ10 with Tocotrienols






											CoQ10 Combination Formulas






											Q-Gel






											CoQ10 Creams






											CoQ10 Chewable






											See all CoQ10







									Vision





											Vision Health Combination Formulas






											Lutein






											Bilberry






											Zeaxanthin






											Eye Drops






											Astaxanthin






											Eyebright






											Goji Berry/Wolfberry






											Beta Carotene






											See all Vision







									Memory & Brain Support





											Memory and Brain Combination Formulas






											Phosphatidylserine (PS)






											Ginkgo Biloba






											Acetyl L-Carnitine






											Lion's Mane Mushroom






											Bacopa






											Alpha GPC






											Phosphatidylcholine






											DMAE
											






											Choline/Inositol






											See all Memory & Brain Support







									Multivitamins





											Whole Food Multivitamin






											Men's Multivitamin






											Women's Multivitamin






											Multivitamin Combination Formulas






											Senior Multivitamin






											Children's Multivitamin






                                            Prenatal Vitamins






											A, C, E, and Selenium






											Pet Multivitamin






											See all Multivitamins







									B Vitamins





											Vitamin B Complexes 






											Vitamin B-12






											Biotin






											Vitamin B-6 Pyridoxine






											Vitamin B-3 Niacin






											Folic Acid






											Inositol






											Vitamin B-15 DMG






											Brewer's Yeast






											Vitamin B-5 Pantothenic Acid






											See all B Vitamins







									Sleep





											Sleep Combination Formulas






											Melatonin






											Homeopathic Sleep Aids






											Magnesium Glycinate






											L-Tryptophan 






											Lemon Balm






											Valerian






											Sleep Aid Tea 






											Skullcap






											See all Sleep







									Weight Loss





											Garcinia Cambogia 






											Metabolism/Thermogenesis






											Apple Cider Vinegar






											Appetite Control






											Fat Absorption and Storage






											Carbohydrate Control






											7-Keto DHEA






											Weight Loss Tea






											Meal Replacements






											Lean Muscle






											See all Weight Loss







									Food & Beverage





											Tea






											Nuts and Seeds






											Breakfast Foods






											Baking






											Oils and Vinegar






											Fruit and Vegetables






											Honey






											Bars






											Stevia






											Coffee






											See all Food & Beverage







									All Categories








							Specialties
							







Cruelty Free





Vegan





Vegetarian





Organic





Gluten Free





Kosher





Non-GMO





Non-GMO Project Verified






							Brands
							





									See All Brands
									





									Swanson Brands
									





									NOW Foods
									





									Nature's Way
									





									Jarrow Formulas, Inc.
									





									Garden of Life
									





									Source Naturals
									





									Doctor's Best
									





									Enzymatic Therapy
									





									New Chapter
									





									Carlson
									





									Twinlab
									







							Web Specials





							Health Concerns
							





							New Arrivals
							







My Account

Login
or
Register















-//W3C//DTD SVG 1.1//EN" "http://www.w3.org/Graphics/SVG/1.1/DTD/svg11.dtd">












































0
Your Cart ▾








0


Cart
Checkout









Search



All


All
Heart Health
Joint Health
Probiotics
CoQ10
Vision Health
Memory and Brain Support
Multivitamins
B Vitamins
Sleep
Weight Loss
Food & Beverage












Your browser's JavaScript appears to be disabled. Please turn it back on to improve your shopping experience.





Vitamins & Supplements
Get discount vitamins and nutritional supplements to keep your whole family healthy. Swanson Health Products is the leader in affordable vitamins and we've got thousands to choose from, including popular products like CoQ10, krill oil and probiotics from top brands like NOW Foods, New Chapter and Enzymatic Therapy. If you're looking for the best deals, though, look for the Swanson label. Our own Swanson brands offer high quality at an unbeatable price.
If you have any questions, just give us a call or chat online with our customer care team. And if you're looking for detailed information about specific products like omega-3 essential fatty acids, chia seeds or chlorella, you can also browse through thousands of health articles, interviews and videos in our Health Library. We even have a collection of healthy recipes!




Amino Acids



5-HTP
Amino Acid Combination Formulas
Branched Chain Formulas
DL-Phenylalanine
GABA
Glycine
L-Arginine
L-Carnitine
L-Citrulline
L-Cysteine
L-Glutamine
L-Glutathione
L-Lysine
L-Methionine
L-Ornithine
L-Phenylalanine
L-Proline
L-Theanine
L-Tryptophan
L-Tyrosine
N-Acetyl Cysteine (NAC)
Peptides
Taurine



Anti-Aging



Acai
Acetyl L-Carnitine
Alpha Lipoic Acid
Anti-Aging Combination Formulas
Anti-Aging Creams and Lotions
ATP (Adenosine Triphosphate)
Benfotiamine
Carnosine
Collagen
DHEA
HGH Releaser
Pregnenolone



Aromatherapy and Essential Oils



Bath
Blend
Body Oil
Carrier Oil
Citrus
Diffuser
Earthy
Floral
Herbaceous
Incense
Massage
Minty
Spicy
Woody



B Vitamins



Biotin
Brewer's Yeast
Choline
Folic Acid
Inositol
Vitamin B Complexes
Vitamin B-1 Thiamin
Vitamin B-12
Vitamin B-15 DMG
Vitamin B-2 Riboflavin
Vitamin B-3 Niacin
Vitamin B-5 Pantothenic Acid
Vitamin B-6 Pyridoxine



Beauty



Aloe Vera
Anti-Aging
Argan Oil
Bath Salts and Sole
Biotin
Body Oils
Body Wash and Shower Gels
Bubble Bath
Conditioners
Cosmetics
Deodorants
Emu Oil
Facial and Body Sponges
Facial Cleansers and Scrubs
Facial Toners
Gelatin
Hair Color
Hair, Skin and Nail Combination Formulas
Horsetail Grass
Hyaluronic Acid
Insect Repellent
Lip Soothers
Loofahs and Body Brushes
Masks
Moisturizing Creams and Lotions
Nail Polish
Perfume
Sea Buckthorn
Shampoo
Shaving
Silica
Soap
SPF Products and Self Tanning
Styling
Tamanu Oil
Tea Tree Oil


Blood Pressure Support



Blood Sugar Support



Blood Sugar Combination Formulas
Blood Sugar Tea
Cactus (Nopal)
Cinnamon
Corosolic Acid (GlucoTrim)
Fenugreek Seed
Gymnema
Inulin
Momordica/Bitter Melon
Niacinamide
Stevia
Sugar Substitutes



Bone



Boron
Calcium
Calcium and Magnesium
Calcium and Vitamin D
Calcium Citrate
Calcium D-Glucarate
Calcium, Magnesium, and Vitamin D
Combination Bone Health Formulas
Coral Calcium
Eggshell Calcium
Isoflavones
Magnesium
Microcrystalline Hydroxyapatite (MCHA)
Oyster Shell Calcium
Strontium
Vitamin D
Vitamin K



Children's Health



Baby Products
Children's Digestive Health
Children's Ear Health
Children's Immune Support
Children's Omega-3s
Children's Probiotics
Children's Stress and Sleep Products
Children's Sunscreen
Children's Vitamins and Minerals
Colic
Focus and Brain Support for Kids
Fruits and Veggies for Kids
Skin and Hair Products for Kids
Teething



Cholesterol Support



Cholesterol Combination Formulas
Guggul
Niacin
Policosanol
Red Yeast Rice
Sytrinol



Cleansing and Detoxification



Charcoal
Cleansing and Detoxification Herbs
Cleansing and Detoxification Tea
Colon Cleanse
Gastrointestinal Cleanse
Liver Cleanse
Metal Detoxification
Urinary Cleanse
Whole Body Cleanse



Colon Care



Colon Care Combination Formulas
Fiber
OTC Medications
Senna Leaf
Slippery Elm



CoQ10



CoQ10 Chewable
CoQ10 Combination Formulas
CoQ10 Creams
CoQ10 Tocotrienols
Q-Gel
Ubiquinol



Dental and Oral Health



Breath Mints and Sprays
Dental Powder
Denture Products
Floss and Dental Cleaners
Gum
Oral Probiotics
Rinses and Mouthwash
Tongue Cleaners
Toothbrushes
Toothpaste



Digestive Health and Fiber



Acacia
Acidophilus/Probiotics
DGL (Deglycyrrhizinated Licorice)
Digestive Enzymes
Digestive Health Combination Formulas
Digestive Health Tea
Ginger Root
Glucomannan
Hydrochloric Acid (HCL)
Lactoferrin
Mastic Gum
Oat Bran
OTC Medications
Pectin
Peppermint
PepZin GI
Psyllium
Wheat Germ



Energy



Bee Products
Cordyceps
Energy Combinations
Energy Drinks
Ginseng
Thyroid Formulas
Velvet Antler
Yerba Mate



Enzymes



Bromelain
Dairy/Lactose Formulas
Enzyme Combination Formulas
Legumase/Anti-Gas
Nattokinase
Pancreatin
Papaya
Proteolytic Enzymes



Essential Fatty Acids



Black Currant Seed Oil
Borage Oil
Chia Seeds
Coconut Oil
Cod Liver Oil
Conjugated Linoleic Acid (CLA)
DHA
Essential Fatty Acid Combination Formula
Evening Primrose Oil
Fish Oil DHA/EPA
Flaxseed
Hemp Seed
Krill Oil
Medium Chain Triglycerides
Olive Oil
Omega-3 EFAs
Omega-7 EFAs
Pumpkin Seed Oil
Red Palm Oil
Rice Bran
Salmon Oil
Shark Liver Oil
Walnut
Wheat Germ Oil



Food and Beverage



Baby Food
Baking
Bars
Beans
Beverages
Bread and Baking Mixes
Breakfast Foods
Brewer's and Nutritional Yeast
Candy
Chia Seeds
Chips and Crackers
Chocolate/Cocoa
Coconut Oil
Coffee
Condiments
Cookies
Fish
Flax
Flour
Fruit and Vegetables
Fruit Spreads
Gum and Mints
Hemp
Herbs
Honey
Jerky
Juices
Meals and Sides
Milk
Nut Butters
Nuts and Seeds
Oils and Vinegars
Pasta
Salt
Seasonings
Soup
Spices
Stevia
Sweeteners
Tea
Whole Grains



Glandular



Adrenal Glandular
Glandular Combination Formulas
Kidney Glandular
Liver Glandular
Lung Glandular
Pancreas Glandular
Pituitary Glandular
Prostate Glandular
Thymus Glandular



Green Foods



Alfalfa
Barley Grass
Blue-Green Algae
Chlorella
Chlorophyll
Ecklonia Cava
Fruits and Veggies
Green Foods Combination Formulas
Red Marine Algae
Seaweed
Spirulina
Sprouts
Wheat Grass



Healthy Home



Bags
Books and Media
Candles
Cleaning Products
Dish Washing
Gardening
Kitchen Accessories
Kitchenware
Laundry
Light Bulbs
Mixers and Shakers
Odor Eliminators
Produce Wash
Tea Ball
Water Filters and Bottles


Hearing and Ear Health



Heart



Aspirin
Calcium and Magnesium
Cardiovascular Combination Formulas
D-Ribose
Diosmin/Hesperidin
EDTA
Garlic
Hawthorn
Homocysteine Formulas
L-Arginine
L-Carnitine
Lecithin
Magnesium
Omega-3 EFAs
Pantethine
Phytosterols
Polyphenols/OPCs
Resveratrol
Vitamin E
Vitamin K
Zinc



Herbs



Acerola
Aloe
American Ginseng
Amla Fruit
Andrographis
Arjuna
Artemisia/Wormwood
Artichoke
Ashwagandha
Astragalus
Bacopa Monnieri
Banaba
Bilberry
Black Cherry
Black Cohosh
Black Pepper
Black Walnut Hulls
Blessed Thistle
Blueberry Leaf
Boswellia
Burdock Root
Butcher's Broom
Butterbur
Cactus, Nopal
Camu Camu Berries
Cascara Sagrada
Cat's Claw
Catuaba
Cayenne
Celery Seed
Chamomile
Chasteberry
Chickweed
Cilantro/Coriander
Cinnamon
Cissus
Coleus Forskohlii
Cordyceps
Cramp Bark
Cranberry
Dandelion
Dong Quai
Echinacea
Elderberry
Evening Primrose Flowers
Eyebright
Fennel
Fenugreek
Feverfew
Fo-Ti
Ginger
Ginkgo biloba
Goldenseal
Gotu Kola
Grapefruit Peel
Grapefruit Seed
Grapeseed
Green Tea
Guarana
Gugulipid
Gymnema
Hawthorn
Herb Combinations
Holy Basil
Hops
Horse Chestnut
Horsetail
Huperzine A
Hydrangea Root
Hyssop
Juniper Berries
Korean Ginseng
Kudzu Root
Lemon Balm
Licorice Root
Maca
Mangosteen
Maqui
Marshmallow
Milk Thistle
Mint
Moringa
Mucuna Pruriens
Muira Puama
Mulberry
Mullein
Mushrooms
Myrrh
Neem Leaf
Nettle
Noni
Olive Leaf
Oregano
Oregon Grape
Parsley
Passionflower
Pau d'Arco
Pomegranate
Psyllium
Pycnogenol
Pygeum
Raspberry
Red Clover
Red Wine
Rhodiola
Rooibos
Rose Hips
Rosemary
Sage
Sarsaparilla Root
Saw Palmetto
Schizandra
Senna
Shatavari
Siberian Ginseng/Eleuthero Root
Skullcap
Slippery Elm
St. John's Wort
Suma
Tart Cherry
Thyme
Tribulus
Triphala
Turmeric
Uva Ursi
Valerian
Vinpocetine
White Willow
Wild Cherry Bark
Wild Yam
Yellow Dock
Yohimbe
Yucca



Homeopathic Remedies



Acne
Allergies and Sinus Inflammation
Anti-Yeast Products
Arnica
Arthritis
Bruising
Children's Concerns
Cold Sores
Colds and Flu
Ear Health
Emotional Health
Eye Drops
Fitness and Sports Recovery
Flower Essences/Remedies
Gas
Heartburn and Indigestion
Hemorrhoids
Incontinence
Insect Bites
Leg Cramps
Migraine Headaches
Motion Sickness
Muscle Pain and Stiffness
Oral Health
Psoriasis
Rash and Itches
Sleep and Relaxation
Smoking Cessation
Warts
Weight Loss and Appetite Control
Women's Concerns



Immune Support



Acidophilus/Probiotics
AHCC
Arabinogalactan (AG)
Beta Glucan
Colostrum
Glandular Formulas
Grapefruit Seed Extract
Hand Sanitizers
High Metabolite Immunogens
Immune Health Combination Formulas
Immune Support Herbs
Immune Support Mushrooms
Immune Tea
IP-6
L-Lysine
SOD (SuperOxide Dismutase)
Vitamin C
Zinc





Joint Health



Avocado/Soy (ASU)
Boswellia
Celadrin/Cetyl Myristoleate
Chondroitin
Collagen
Devil's Claw
Glucosamine
Glucosamine/Chondroitin/MSM
Green-Lipped Mussel
Hyaluronic Acid
Joint Health Combination Formulas
MicroLactin
MSM
OTC Medications
SAMe
Shark Cartilage
Tart Cherry



Liver Health



Liver Cleanse
Liver Health Combination Formulas
Liver Health Glandulars
Milk Thistle
Trimethylglycine (TMG)



Medicine Cabinet



Acid Reducers and Heartburn
Allergies
Anti-Diarrheal
Contacts and Drops
Cotton Balls and Swabs
Cuts and Scrapes
Empty Capsules
Gas Relief
Hand Sanitizer
Hot and Cold Packs
Insect Repellent and Bites
Nasal and Neti Pots
Orthopedic Support
Pain Relief
Pill Crusher and Splitter
Psoriasis Cream
Razors
Sleep Aids
SPF Products
Stool Softener
Supplement Holders and Planners
Suppositories



Memory and Brain Support



Acetyl L-Carnitine
Alpha GPC
Bacopa
Choline/Inositol
DMAE
Ginkgo biloba
L-Glutamine
Lion's Mane Mushroom
Memory and Brain Combination Formulas
NADH
Phosphatidylcholine
Phosphatidylserine (PS)



Men's Health



Men's Hair Formulas
Men's Hormone Balance
Men's Multivitamin and Mineral Formulas
Men's Personal Care
Prostate Health



Minerals



Albion
Calcium
Chromium
Copper
Iodine
Iron
Magnesium
Manganese
Mineral Combination Formulas
Potassium
Selenium
Silicon
Silver and Colloidal
Vanadium
Zinc



Multiple Vitamins plus Minerals



A, C, E, and Selenium
Children's Multivitamin
Men's Multivitamin
Multivitamin Combination Formulas
Pet Multivitamin
Prenatal Vitamins
Senior Multivitamin
Whole Food Multivitamin
Women's Multivitamin



Mushrooms



Agaricus Blazei
Lion's Mane
Maitake
Mushroom Combination Formulas
Reishi
Shiitake
Turkey Tail



Pet Products



Cats
Dogs


pH Balance



Probiotics



Acidophilus/Lactobacillus
Bacillus Coagulans
Bifidobacterium Probiotic
FOS (Fructooligosaccharides)
HSOs (Homeostatic Soil Organisms)
NEW Swanson Probiotics
Prebiotics
Probiotics by Potency
Probiotics for Digestive Health
Probiotics for Immune System
Probiotics for Kids
Probiotics for Men
Probiotics for Pets
Probiotics for Seniors
Probiotics for Weight Loss
Probiotics for Women
Probiotics with Prebiotics
Reuteri
Saccharomyces Boulardii



Professional Lines



Amino Acids
Anti-Aging
B Vitamins
Beauty
Blood Sugar Support
Bone
Children's Health
Cholesterol Support
Cleansing and Detoxification
Colon Care
CoQ10
Digestive Health and Fiber
Energy
Enzymes
Essential Fatty Acids
Glandular
Green Foods
Heart
Herbs
Immune Support
Joint Health
Liver Health
Medicine Cabinet
Memory and Brain Support
Men's Health
Minerals
Multiple Vitamins plus Minerals
Mushrooms
Probiotics
Respiratory Health
Sexual Health
Sleep
Sports Nutrition
Stress and Mood
Urinary Tract Health
Vision Health
Vitamin A
Vitamin C
Vitamin D
Vitamin E
Vitamin K
Weight Loss
Women's Health



Respiratory Health



OTC Respiratory Medications
Quercetin
Respiratory Health Combination Formulas
Respiratory Herbs
Respiratory Tea



Sexual Health



Avena Sativa (Oat Straw)
Catuaba Bark
Citrulline
Damiana
DHEA
Horny Goat Weed
L-Arginine
Maca
Mucuna Pruriens
Sexual Health Combination Formulas
Tongkat Ali/LongJax
Tribulus
Yohimbe



Sleep



Homeopathic Sleep Aids
Magnesium Glycinate
Melatonin
Sleep Aid Tea
Sleep Combination Formulas
Sleep OTC Medications



Sports Nutrition



Aminos
Creatine
Electrolytes
Endurance
Inosine
Protein
Recovery
Ribose
Testosterone Support
ZMA



Stress and Mood



Emotional Health Combination Formulas
Homeopathic Stress Relief
Relora
Rhodiola Rosea
Stress Relief Combinations
Stress Relief Tea



Urinary Tract Health



Cranberry
D-Mannose Powder
Urinary Health Combination Formulas



Vision Health



Astaxanthin
Beta Carotene
Bilberry
Eye Drops
Eyebright
Goji Berry/Wolfberry
Lutein
Vision Health Combination Formulas
Zeaxanthin


Vitamin A



Vitamin C



Ascorbyl Palmitate (C Ester)
Bioflavonoids
Buffered Vitamin C
Children's Vitamin C Formulas
Ester-C
Mineral Ascorbates
Vitamin C Combination Formulas
Vitamin C Creams and Lotions
Vitamin C Stress Formulas
Vitamin C with Rose Hips
Zinc and Vitamin C Lozenges


Vitamin D



Vitamin E



Dry Vitamin E
Mixed Tocopherols
Tocotrienols
Vitamin E and Selenium
Vitamin E Combination Formulas
Vitamin E Creams and Lotions



Vitamin K



Vitamin K Combinations
Vitamin K1
Vitamin K2



Weight Loss



7-Keto DHEA
African Mango
Appetite Control
Apple Cider Vinegar
Carbohydrate Control
Fat Absorption and Storage
Garcinia Cambogia
Green Coffee Bean
Hoodia Gordonii
Lean Muscle
Meal Replacements
Metabolism/Thermogenesis
Raspberry Ketones
Water Balance
Weight Loss Foods
Weight Loss Herbs
Weight Loss Tea



Women's Health



Breast Health
PMS and Menopause
Pregnancy and Breast Feeding
Prenatal Health
Tampons and Pads
Women's Acidophilus/Probiotics
Women's Leg Vein Health
Women's Multivitamin and Mineral Formula
Women's NeuroMuscular Sensitivities









GET OUR BEST DEALS STRAIGHT TO YOUR INBOX!


Sign Up Now















Your first offer is on the way!
You're now signed up to receive exclusive deals and savings opportunities!

Thank You! This email address is already signed up.
Thank you for your interest and be assured that you will continue to receive our emails at this address.

Oops!
We are having trouble processing your request. Our apologies! Please try again later.





					Help





					Shipping





					Returns







					Product Quality
					





					Social Responsibility
					





					Privacy & Security
					







			Customer Service
			



			About Swanson
			





Careers




International






Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products






youtube 




   






   




   



   




           





Safe Shopping Network

consumerlab


Secured by Entrust


Better Business Bureau


GMP


Stella Chat


Ratings based on results of the 2017
        ConsumerLab.com Survey of Supplement Users. More information at
        
             http://www.consumerlab.com/survey2017
        


		*These statements have not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration.
		These products are not intended to diagnose, treat, cure or prevent any disease.
	

		For our website and catalog, the MSRP is the "Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price."  The MSRP is understood to mean the price at which a manufacturer will recommend a retailer sell a product for in stores, on the internet, or in catalogs.  The MSRP of National brand items are dictated to Swanson by each manufacturer.  For Swanson brand items, the MSRP is calculated based on a varying percentage above the product's base price.
	
© 2017 Swanson Health Products – Terms of Service 







Feedback
            








































Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products


Easy Refill


Get your favorite products delivered automatically
10% off future orders of Swanson brand products in your subscription
FREE standard shipping on all future orders over $50
Control the frequency, delivery date, item quantity... or cancel at any time
Email reminders before each delivery

See all FAQs here









































































Add and Review Order


Add and Keep Shopping












Buy 1 Get 1 Free - Swanson Health Products
































 
                                        
 
                                        
  
                                        









No
                                    Thanks



Your 10% Off Promo Code is on the Way! Thanks for signing up for emails.
You're now signed up to receive exclusive deals and savings
                                opportunities!
Thanks again for connecting with us. Keep an eye on your inbox — your first coupon
                                is on its way!

CLOSE



Thank You! This email address is already signed up

You are signed up for the following:

Offers
Recipes
E-Newsletter
Updates & Reminders

Thank you for your interest and be assured that you will continue to receive our emails at
                            this address.
Look for your next communication from us within the next week.
CLOSE



Oops!
We are having trouble processing your request.
Our apologies!
Please try again later.

CLOSE











Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products







Search Please enter an item number or keyword



All


All
Heart Health
Joint Health
Probiotics
CoQ10
Vision Health
Memory and Brain Support
Multivitamins
B Vitamins
Sleep
Weight Loss
Food & Beverage




Search









NEW Probiotics!


Swanson Brands


New Arrivals


Web Specials


Swanson Blog


Sign Up for Deals & Tips





Shop byCategory ▾
Do YouNeed Help? ▾





 Sign In or  Register







0
Your Cart ▾








0


Cart
Checkout











Probiotics


Products & Benefits


NEW Swanson Probiotics


Probiotics for Digestive Health


Probiotics for Immune System


Probiotics for Women


Probiotics for Seniors


Probiotics by Potency


Acidophilus/Lactobacillus


Reuteri


FOS (Fructooligosaccharides)


Saccharomyces Boulardii


See all Probiotics






Cleansing & Detoxification


Products & Benefits


Colon Cleanse


Charcoal


Liver Cleanse


Gastrointestinal Cleanse


Cleansing and Detoxification Herbs


Cleansing and Detoxification Tea


Whole Body Cleanse


Metal Detoxification


Urinary Cleanse


Respiratory Cleanse


See All






CoQ10


Products & Benefits


Ubiquinol


CoQ10 with Tocotrienols


CoQ10 Combination Formulas


Q-Gel


CoQ10 Chewable


CoQ10 Creams


See All






Digestive Health


Products & Benefits


Acidophilus/Probiotics


Digestive Enzymes


Digestive Health Combination Formulas


Psyllium


Ginger Root


Hydrochloric Acid (HCL)


DGL (Deglycyrrhizinated Licorice)


Pectin


Glucomannan


PepZin GI


See All






Herbs


Products & Benefits


Turmeric


Mushrooms


Pycnogenol


Milk Thistle


Tart Cherry


Cinnamon


Saw Palmetto


Black Pepper


Olive Leaf


Ginkgo Biloba


See All






Vitamin C


Products & Benefits


Vitamin C with Rose Hips


Vitamin C Combination Formulas


Bioflavonoids


Vitamin C Stress Formulas


Ester-C


Buffered Vitamin C


Vitamin C Creams and Lotions


Mineral Ascorbates


Zinc and Vitamin C Lozenges


Children's Vitamin C Formulas


See All






Women's Health


Products & Benefits


PMS and Menopause


Women's Multivitamin and Mineral Formula


Women's Acidophilus/Probiotics


Women's Leg Vein Health


Prenatal Health


Pregnancy and Breast Feeding


Tampons and Pads


Breast Health


See All






Men's Health


Products & Benefits


Prostate Health


Men's Multivitamin and Mineral Formulas


Men's Hormone Balance


Men's Hair Formulas


Men's Personal Care


See All






Enzymes


Products & Benefits


Enzyme Combination Formulas


Nattokinase


Proteolytic Enzymes


Bromelain


Papaya


Pancreatin


Legumase/Anti-Gas


Dairy/Lactose Formulas


See All






Heart


Products & Benefits


Omega-3 EFAs


Magnesium


Polyphenols/OPCs


Vitamin E


Cardiovascular Combination Formulas


Vitamin K


Resveratrol


Garlic


L-Arginine


Phytosterols


See All






Food & Beverage


Products & Benefits


Tea


Nuts and Seeds


Breakfast Foods


Honey


Oils and Vinegar


Baking


Bars


Stevia


Fruit and Vegetables


Juices


See All







					All Categories








helpdesk
					Help Deskclick here



10faq
					Top 10 FAQsclick here



needHelp
Chat8am–11pm CT Mon–Satstart chat



email
Email6am–Midnight CT Mon–Satsend message



call
Call7am–Midnight CT Mon–Sat1-800-824-4491
















Call NowTo Order!


Categories





All Categories





                                    Probiotics





NEW Swanson Probiotics
                                            






                                            Probiotics for Digestive Health






                                            Probiotics for Immune System






                                            Probiotics for Women






                                            Probiotics for Seniors






                                            Probiotics by Potency






                                            Acidophilus/Lactobacillus






                                            Reuteri






                                            FOS (Fructooligosaccharides)






                                            Saccharomyces Boulardii






                                            See all Probiotics







									Heart





											Cardiovascular Combination Formulas






                                            Magnesium






                                            Resveratrol






                                            Omega-3 EFAs






											Vitamin E






											L-Arginine






											Vitamin K
											






											D-Ribose






											L-Carnitine






											Polyphenols/OPCs






											See all Heart







				 					Joint





											Glucosamine/Chondroitin/MSM






											Joint Health Combination Formulas






											Hyaluronic Acid






											Collagen






											Glucosamine






											Tart Cherry






											Boswellia






											MSM






											SAMe






											Celadrin/Cetyl Myristoleate






											See all Joint







									CoQ10





											Ubiquinol






											CoQ10 with Tocotrienols






											CoQ10 Combination Formulas






											Q-Gel






											CoQ10 Creams






											CoQ10 Chewable






											See all CoQ10







									Vision





											Vision Health Combination Formulas






											Lutein






											Bilberry






											Zeaxanthin






											Eye Drops






											Astaxanthin






											Eyebright






											Goji Berry/Wolfberry






											Beta Carotene






											See all Vision







									Memory & Brain Support





											Memory and Brain Combination Formulas






											Phosphatidylserine (PS)






											Ginkgo Biloba






											Acetyl L-Carnitine






											Lion's Mane Mushroom






											Bacopa






											Alpha GPC






											Phosphatidylcholine






											DMAE
											






											Choline/Inositol






											See all Memory & Brain Support







									Multivitamins





											Whole Food Multivitamin






											Men's Multivitamin






											Women's Multivitamin






											Multivitamin Combination Formulas






											Senior Multivitamin






											Children's Multivitamin






                                            Prenatal Vitamins






											A, C, E, and Selenium






											Pet Multivitamin






											See all Multivitamins







									B Vitamins





											Vitamin B Complexes 






											Vitamin B-12






											Biotin






											Vitamin B-6 Pyridoxine






											Vitamin B-3 Niacin






											Folic Acid






											Inositol






											Vitamin B-15 DMG






											Brewer's Yeast






											Vitamin B-5 Pantothenic Acid






											See all B Vitamins







									Sleep





											Sleep Combination Formulas






											Melatonin






											Homeopathic Sleep Aids






											Magnesium Glycinate






											L-Tryptophan 






											Lemon Balm






											Valerian






											Sleep Aid Tea 






											Skullcap






											See all Sleep







									Weight Loss





											Garcinia Cambogia 






											Metabolism/Thermogenesis






											Apple Cider Vinegar






											Appetite Control






											Fat Absorption and Storage






											Carbohydrate Control






											7-Keto DHEA






											Weight Loss Tea






											Meal Replacements






											Lean Muscle






											See all Weight Loss







									Food & Beverage





											Tea






											Nuts and Seeds






											Breakfast Foods






											Baking






											Oils and Vinegar






											Fruit and Vegetables






											Honey






											Bars






											Stevia






											Coffee






											See all Food & Beverage







									All Categories








							Specialties
							







Cruelty Free





Vegan





Vegetarian





Organic





Gluten Free





Kosher





Non-GMO





Non-GMO Project Verified






							Brands
							





									See All Brands
									





									Swanson Brands
									





									NOW Foods
									





									Nature's Way
									





									Jarrow Formulas, Inc.
									





									Garden of Life
									





									Source Naturals
									





									Doctor's Best
									





									Enzymatic Therapy
									





									New Chapter
									





									Carlson
									





									Twinlab
									







							Web Specials





							Health Concerns
							





							New Arrivals
							







My Account

Login
or
Register















-//W3C//DTD SVG 1.1//EN" "http://www.w3.org/Graphics/SVG/1.1/DTD/svg11.dtd">












































0
Your Cart ▾








0


Cart
Checkout









Search



All


All
Heart Health
Joint Health
Probiotics
CoQ10
Vision Health
Memory and Brain Support
Multivitamins
B Vitamins
Sleep
Weight Loss
Food & Beverage












Your browser's JavaScript appears to be disabled. Please turn it back on to improve your shopping experience.







Web Specials


					Deal of the Day



					On Sale Now



					Buy 1 Get 1 Free!



					Clearance




Shop by Category



Amino Acids (617)

B Vitamins (638)

Beauty (3897)

Bone (984)

Children's Health (698)

CoQ10 (275)

Digestive (1083)

Energy (874)

Enzymes (324)

Essential Fatty Acids (986)

Food and Beverage (3595)

Green Foods (422)

Heart (2120)

Herbs (2604)

Homeopathic Remedies (775)

Immune Support (1872)

Joint Health (719)

Kyoto Brand (10)

Lee Swanson Signature Line (10)

Men's Health (436)

Minerals (876)

Multiple Vitamins plus Minerals (787)

Pet Products (197)

Probiotics (421)

Sexual Health (341)

Sleep (476)

Sports Nutrition (857)

Vision Health (285)

Vitamin C (405)

Weight Loss (492)

Women's Health (678)



Alpha Lipoic Acid (73)


Anti-Aging (738)


Aromatherapy and Essential Oils (669)


Astaxanthin (36)


Biotin (67)


Blood Sugar Support (469)


Bone (984)


Children's Health (698)


Coconut Oil (73)


Energy (874)


Enzymes (324)


Essential Fatty Acids (986)


Fish Oil (272)


Green Foods (422)


Healthy Home (535)


Homeopathic Remedies (775)


Lee Swanson Signature Line (10)


Magnesium (204)


Medicine Cabinet (630)


Memory & Brain Support (580)


Men's Health (436)


Milk Thistle (62)


Minerals (876)


Pet Products (197)


Probiotics (421)


Sleep (476)


Stress and Mood (568)


Turmeric (122)


Vision Health (285)


Vitamin C (405)


Women's Health (678)



					View all




Top Items


					Brands



        			Swanson Brands



					Top-Rated Products



					New Arrivals




Shop Specialties

 
					Cruelty Free (3454)

 
					Vegan (3550)

 
					Vegetarian (6130)

 
					Organic (2280)

 
					Gluten Free (8335)

 
					Kosher (3131)

 
					Non-GMO (4840)

 
					Non-GMO Project Verified (2291)




Quick Links


					Review a Product



					Catalog Quick Buy



					Request a Catalog



					Swanson Health Blog



					Health Concerns




About Us







					100% Guarantee



					Contact Us



					Help



					Health Library


















Dr. Stephen Langer's Ultimate 16 Strain Probiotic with FOS




                        3 Billon CFU 60 Veg Drcaps





2 for
$15.99


Add to Cart












Full Spectrum Turmeric & Black Pepper




                        60 Veg Caps





2 for
$12.99


Add to Cart












HiActives Tart Cherry




                        465 mg 60 Caps





2 for
$8.99


Add to Cart














Triple Strength Melatonin




                        10 mg 60 Caps





2 for
$5.99


Add to Cart
Availability: Backordered                                       












Resveratrol 100




                        100 mg 30 Caps





2 for
$9.99


Add to Cart












Natural Vitamin K2 (Menaquinone-7 from Natto)




                        50 mcg 30 Sgels





2 for
$10.99


Add to Cart














Green Tea Extract




                        500 mg 60 Caps





2 for
$6.99


Add to Cart












Maca




                        500 mg 60 Caps





2 for
$5.99


Add to Cart












Vitamin B-12 with Folic Acid




                        60 Tabs





2 for
$6.99


Add to Cart














Astaxanthin & Zeaxanthin




                        60 Sgels





2 for
$23.99


Add to Cart












Natural Vitamin K-2 (Menaquinone-7 from Natto)




                        100 mcg 30 Sgels





2 for
$17.99


Add to Cart












Epic-Pro 25-Strain Probiotic




                        30 Billion CFU 30 Veg Drcaps





2 for
$21.99


Add to Cart














SeMSC Selenium




                        200 mcg 120 Caps





2 for
$6.99


Add to Cart












Cinnamon Extract




                        250 mg 90 Caps





2 for
$5.99


Add to Cart












Delayed-Release Standardized Ginkgo




                        120 mg 100 Veg Drcaps





2 for
$15.99


Add to Cart














L-Citrulline Malate Complex




                        750 mg 60 Caps





2 for
$9.99


Add to Cart












Garcinia Cambogia




                        500 mg 90 Veg Caps





2 for
$16.99


Add to Cart












Folate (5-Methyltetrahydrofolic Acid)




                        800 mcg 30 Veg Caps





2 for
$5.99


Add to Cart










Products 1-18 of 157
		|  view all
	  	| Page:
		12
3
4
5
6
7
>
>>






GET OUR BEST DEALS STRAIGHT TO YOUR INBOX!


Sign Up Now















Your first offer is on the way!
You're now signed up to receive exclusive deals and savings opportunities!

Thank You! This email address is already signed up.
Thank you for your interest and be assured that you will continue to receive our emails at this address.

Oops!
We are having trouble processing your request. Our apologies! Please try again later.





					Help





					Shipping





					Returns







					Product Quality
					





					Social Responsibility
					





					Privacy & Security
					







			Customer Service
			



			About Swanson
			





Careers




International






Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products






youtube 




   






   




   



   




           





Safe Shopping Network

consumerlab


Secured by Entrust


Better Business Bureau


GMP


Stella Chat


Ratings based on results of the 2017
        ConsumerLab.com Survey of Supplement Users. More information at
        
             http://www.consumerlab.com/survey2017
        


		*These statements have not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration.
		These products are not intended to diagnose, treat, cure or prevent any disease.
	

		For our website and catalog, the MSRP is the "Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price."  The MSRP is understood to mean the price at which a manufacturer will recommend a retailer sell a product for in stores, on the internet, or in catalogs.  The MSRP of National brand items are dictated to Swanson by each manufacturer.  For Swanson brand items, the MSRP is calculated based on a varying percentage above the product's base price.
	
© 2017 Swanson Health Products – Terms of Service 







Feedback
            








































Discount Vitamins and Supplements - Swanson Health Products


Easy Refill


Get your favorite products delivered automatically
10% off future orders of Swanson brand products in your subscription
FREE standard shipping on all future orders over $50
Control the frequency, delivery date, item quantity... or cancel at any time
Email reminders before each delivery

See all FAQs here









































































Add and Review Order


Add and Keep Shopping
















National Pen® Official Site | Promotional Products Since 1966






























 
















  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  
























Quick Shopping Links

Toggle Links



 Quick Shopping Links   National Pen Brand  Buy 1, Get Some Free  Sales & Closeout New Products  Best Selling Products  Rush Service  Full Color Designs 









Submit









Personalized Pens  Retractable Pens Plastic Pens Metal Pens Gel Ink Pens Blue Ink Pens BIC & National Pen  Bags  Tote Bags Coolers  Drinkware  Travel Mugs Water Bottles  Office  Magnets Letter Openers  Auto & Home  Key Chains Flashlights  Stationery  Note Pads Sticky Notes Calendars  Popular Brands  BIC PaperMate Uni-Ball Sharpie KOOZIE 







xClose

	Free Shipping & Setup for New Customers with coupon code FREE!
































 Popular Searches    Contour Pens Squiggle Pens Colorama Pens Cirrus Pens     DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Superball Pen Flashlight Pens     Custom Selfie Stick Key Chain Flashlight  Stylus Pens BIC Pens     Tech Gadgets Budget Friendly Products Low Minimum Pens All Promotional Products    




National Pen®  - Your #1 source for promotional products and personalized pens
National Pen®  offers high quality personalized products at factory-direct pricing.  In business over 45 years, we manufacture and assemble many of our promotional products in the USA.  Advertise your business by imprinting your company name or logo on personalized pens, key chains, note pads, magnets, calendars, mugs, tote bags & more.  Personalized promotional products are perfect for trade show giveaways, customer appreciation, corporate events, and marketing your brand.




























+Close
Join Our Email List


Join our list to be the first to know about new products, special offers, sales and more!
Plus, get 15% off  your next order.


Email:


First Name:


Last Name:


Cancel


                            You can opt out at anytime. Please refer to our Privacy Policy
 or Contact Us
 for more details












XClose
Survey
























Closeout Promotional Products: Pens, Pencils & More | Pens.com





































 
















  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  





























Closeout




































Narrow Your Search:

Toggle filter



Category



						Writing Closeout (2)
					  





						Auto and Home Closeout (12)
					  





						Office Closeout (11)
					  





						Tech Closeout (5)
					  





						Drinkware Closeout (1)
					  


Product Colors



						Assorted (8)
					  





						Black (13)
					  





						Blue (13)
					  





						Brown (1)
					  





						Burgundy (1)
					  





						Custom (2)
					  





						Gold (1)
					  





						Gray (1)
					  





						Green (7)
					  





						Multi-Color (1)
					  





						Show More...


Price



						$0.39 or Less (2)
					  





						$0.40 - $0.59 (4)
					  





						$0.60 - $0.79 (1)
					  





						$0.80 - $0.99 (3)
					  





						$1.00 - $1.49 (10)
					  





						$1.50 - $1.99 (4)
					  





						$2.00 - $2.99 (2)
					  





						$3.00 - $4.99 (5)
					  


Minimum Quantity



						10 - 49 (5)
					  





						50 - 99 (23)
					  





						100 - 199 (2)
					  





						200 or More (1)
					  





Recently Viewed Products:

Toggle Recently Viewed





You have no recently viewed items










xClose

	Free Shipping & Setup for New Customers with coupon code FREE!






Closeout Promotional Items


        31 results found











Items per page:


                                      12
24
36
48
All

Sort by:

Default
Best Sellers
Price: Low - High
Price: High - Low
Minimum Quantity
Name: A - Z
Name: Z - A


  Grid
  List




















				Handy Helper Phone Stand





						As low as

		$1.16

						each!


















				Laser Engraved Journal with Strap





						As low as

		$3.19

						each!


















				Executive Notepad with Neon Flags





						As low as

		$1.59

						each!


















				Deluxe Sticky Notebook with Apple Notes





						As low as

		$1.45

						each!


















				Window Frame Journal





						As low as

		$1.89

						each!


















				School Pouch





						As low as

		$0.89

						each!


















				Contempo Desk Calculator





						As low as

		$2.29

						each!


















				USB Laptop LED Flex-Light





						As low as

		$1.29

						each!


















				Glitter/Sparkle Pencil





						As low as

		$0.19

						each!


















				Trusty Dual Light with Bottle Opener





						As low as

		$1.49

						each!


















				Patriot Party Light





						As low as

		$0.79

						each!


















				Expedition Key Ring





						As low as

		$1.39

						each!














1
2
3



This closeout sale is a great way to save on some of the hottest promotional items around. From customized key rings that sport your company's logo to colorful pens that your clients can't help but notice, this page contains dependable, high-quality products at a fraction of their regular cost.With your personalized closeout order, you'll receive steeply discounted products without compromising on quality. These savings are sure to magnify your already deep closeout discounts of 50 percent or more. These items aren't just affordable: Designed with the highest quality in mind, they're designed to offer the best value around. Each closeout spiral notebook is held together with the finest plastic rings that can be customized in virtually any color of your choosing.Every sturdy carabiner is tested to ensure that it can hold a solid load. Even the closeout zoom-light key chains that you'll find here are built to emit concentrated, powerful illumination that can help your clients read in the dark or find their way around a closet.Of course, no closeout sale would be complete without a full range of customization options. With over 500 custom colors and the ability to imprint a wide range of images and characters onto each item of your order, your closeout order is sure to help your company stand out from the crowd.These personalized products are great for distributing at big events like trade shows or conventions, and they work well as guerrilla marketing tools as well. You can even use them to turn your next customer appreciation day into an advertising bonanza.Before you place your order, be sure to make it your own. For maximum impact, wrap your items with a printed image or logo that sums up your business. To stay fresh in the minds of prospective clients, imprint your company's slogan or contact information on your closeout products. Once you're ready to purchase, simply choose your desired quantity and await your game-changing shipment.





































Back to School | National Pen




 












  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  



















	    	    
		 
		





Back to School









Fun Supplies 


Everyday Necessities 


Upgraded Basics 




Shop by Category


Pens & Writing


Stationery


Bags


Drinkware


Tech Gadgets


Apparel & Accessories






Top Picks




 






					Deluxe Neon Round Pencil



								As low as 
		$0.16

								each!







 






					The Campus Backpack



								As low as 
		$7.86

								each!







 






					The Star Spiral Notebook



								As low as 
		$1.63

								each!







 






					Clear Solar Calculator



								As low as 
		$2.76

								each!







 






					BIC® 3x3 Die Cut Sticky Notepad-50 Sheet-Octagon



								As low as 
		$0.95

								each!







 






					8" Calculator / Ruler



								As low as 
		$1.49

								each!







 






					Budget Lunch Bag



								As low as 
		$1.49

								each!







 






					6 Piece Crayon Set



								As low as 
		$0.44

								each!

































Cheap Promotional Items - Pens & Budget Promotional Products | National Pen
























 














  Pens & Writing Pens & Writing    pens plastic retractable metal stick translucent rollerball grip gel ink twist novelty stylus gift sets blue ink light up pens SmoothWrite™ Ink     highlighters markers pencils standard mechanical golf pencils Shop All Pens & Writing     Shop by Family contour pens squiggle pens colorama pens Cirrus Pens DynaGrip Pens Paragon Pens Shop by Brand BIC® Paper Mate Goofy Uni-ball Sharpie       Featured Item  Bering Stylus Pen  as low as $0.64     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Bags Bags    business bags laptop briefcases backpacks drawstring bags tote bags Reusable Shopping Bags paper bags     travel bags luggage accessories coolers & lunch bags duffle bags Canvas Bags plastic bags golf bags Shop All Bags     Shop by Brand High Sierra KOOZIE® elleven Case Logic       Featured Item  Budget Shopper Tote  as low as $0.99     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Drinkware Drinkware    travel mugs stadium cups glassware tumblers Bottle Openers     thermos water bottles ceramic mugs beverage holders KOOZIE® Coasters Shop All Drinkware     Shop by Brand Tritan KOOZIE® Cool Gear       Featured Item  Square Coaster with Bottle Opener  as low as $1.13     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Stationery Stationery & Calendars    stationery sticky notes presentation folders padfolios note pads note pad sets flag sets document holders business card holders     Holiday Cards Calendars wall calendars Stick Up Calendars magnetic calendars planners & diaries desk calendars calendar accessories       Featured Item  Spiral Bound Notebook with Colored Dividers  as low as $1.65     Shop Now           Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Tech & Office Tech & Office    Tech Gadgets USB flash drives stylus Cell Phone Stands Selfie Sticks Audio & Music Earbuds & Headphones Speakers Portable Chargers Power Banks Tech Accessories mouse pads     desk accessories calculators letter opener rulers magnets auto magnets shaped magnets business card magnets Business Card Products Stress Relief Shop All Tech & Office     Shop by Brand BIC® iFidelity myCharge Tangle Zoom       Featured Item  8GB Promotional USB Flash Drive  as low as $3.49     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          Tradeshow Tradeshow    lanyards & badges Banners & Signs candy table covers & throws Tote Bags buttons, pins, ribbons balloons accessories Shop All Tradeshow       Featured Item  11" Crystal Balloon  as low as $0.15     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Auto & Home Auto & Home    home living Clocks & Watches piggy banks picture frames ornaments home accessories Magnets apparel shirts polo shirts outerwear Women's Clothing Men's Clothing headwear sunglasses bracelets kitchenware kitchen products clips auto accessories Ice Scrapers flashlights     outdoor umbrellas blankets sports outdoor accessories golf chairs Beach Balls wellness personal care lip balm hand sanitizers first aid Emery Boards tools screwdrivers carpenter tools tape measures Knives keychains plastic metal light up Shop All Auto & Home     Shop by Brand Gildan Slazenger Hanes Carhartt Cutter & Buck Titleist       Featured Item  LED Flashlight Key Chain  as low as $1.54     Shop Now            Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas         Gifts Gifts    Top Gift Ideas Gift Bags Back to School Food & Drinkware  Reunion Favors Calendars & Planners Rush Products Tech Gadgets luxury gifts Wedding Gifts Graduation Gifts Shop All Gifts       Featured Item  Gelato Pen and Flashlight Gift Set  as low as $1.29     Shop Now             Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas        Closeout Closeout    Auto & Home Drinkware Office     Tech Gadgets Writing See All Closeout          Save on Best              Selling Products        Personalized              Gift Ideas          See All  


















 



xClose

	Free Shipping & Setup for New Customers with coupon code FREE!




  Cheap Promotional Items - Pens & Budget Promotional Products        Shop all Budget Friendly Products                  Shop all Budget Friendly Products         100 for $99 + 50 free   SHOP NOW       contour pens          50 for $64.50   SHOP NOW       Paragon Pens            50 for $49.50   SHOP NOW       Cabaret Stylus Pens          150 for $73.50   SHOP NOW       Executive Cirrus Pens            100 for $59.00   SHOP NOW       DynaGrip Silver Pen          100 for $69.00   SHOP NOW       Crystal Pen            100 for $69.00   SHOP NOW       Cayes Gel Pen          100 for $65.00   SHOP NOW       Opal Pen            200 for $62.00 + 100 free   SHOP NOW       Superball Pens          50 for $69.50   SHOP NOW       Paragon Pens & Stylus Tips            100 for $68.00   SHOP NOW       Metro Gel Pens          100 for $69.00   SHOP NOW       TRANSLUCENT SQUIGGLE PENS              Budget promotional products from National Pen are designed to attract the right kind of attention to your business - all at prices that will comfortably fit any budget. Our cheap promotional items include a variety of customizable gifts - including many of our best-selling pens and cheap promotional pen sets. Best of all, we eliminate the guesswork and create pre-selected promotional packages that will help you to spotlight your business or organization, all while keeping more of your marketing budget intact. By offering special, budget promotional pricing on many of our most effective promotional pens, we can simplify the process of ordering custom pens to help you to target more key players in your industry. Our legendary Contour pen is included in our offerings of cheap promotional items. The Contour promotional pen delivers tremendous value with a jumbo-sized barrel, handy pocket clip, smooth-writing ink cartridge, soft rubber gripping surface, and generously-sized imprint field that can hold several lines of personalized text. Shop now and receive factory-direct pricing on these cheap promotional pens. If your tastes run a bit more contemporary, you and your clients will love our Paragon pen, which delivers sleek lines, subtle chrome accents, a polished pocket clip, gleaming low-profile barrel, and plenty of space for your customized message. Looking for combination budget promotional products? Consider the Paragon pen with stylus tip. This handy pen features all of the executive style of our standard Paragon pen but also includes a handy stylus tip that makes interfacing with any touchscreen a simple - and smudge-free, action. Or, our cheap promotional Superball pens will make you feel like you've won the lottery, as significant quantities can be had for pennies on the dollar. Again, these pens, and virtually all of the other pens within our extensive catalog of cheap promotional items, are customizable with your choice of text or graphics. When you are ready to place an order for a batch of budget-friendly products, simply contact us directly or click on the blue customize button on each individual product page. Within minutes you'll create a personalized order at an incredibly low upfront cost. Upon receiving your completed order request, we will get to work immediately and prepare your custom order for shipping in a matter of days. We invite you to customize your order with your choice of imprint - so get creative and include your business contact information, marketing or advertising message, your logo or graphics, or anything else that you feel will add value to your presentation. We will then employ sophisticated engraving or imprinting techniques to bring your creation to life! As always, you'll shop with total confidence at National Pen. We bring decades of experience and leadership to the table, and we offer a 100% quality guarantee, low factory-direct pricing, and an expansive catalog of budget promotional products. Contact us today to get started and we'll help you to assemble a customized order of cheap promotional items that will create added awareness for your brand. We look forward to working with you - after all, your image is our business!     

 







 SPIRALCOOL | Travers Tool Co., Inc.
                        ×Close  Product Added to Your Cart        Continue Shopping     Go to Shopping Cart             ×Close  Item not Added to Cart! Please try again.        Continue Shopping              MENU                                      My Account  Sign In / Register            Phone: 800.221.0270  Fax: 800.722.0703                   Search           Cart 0 (0) – $0.00                       Home Supplies and More SPIRALCOOL                          Narrow Results             SPIRALCOOL                      Sign Up for Exclusive Savings!       Subscribe to receive Travers emails & hear about new arrivals, special promotions and exclusive offers      Sign-Up              Request Your FREE Catalog! Over 1,800 full-color pages geared to the metalworking industry!    Request Free Catalog                                                           Hand & Power Tools | Travers Tool
                        ×Close  Product Added to Your Cart        Continue Shopping     Go to Shopping Cart             ×Close  Item not Added to Cart! Please try again.        Continue Shopping              MENU                                      My Account  Sign In / Register            Phone: 800.221.0270  Fax: 800.722.0703                   Search           Cart 0 (0) – $0.00                       Home MRO Hand & Power Tools       MRO       Hand & Power Tools     Fluid Power    Safety & Hygiene Supplies    Storage & Workshop Equipment    Material Handling Equipment    Adhesives, Paint & Sundries    Fasteners    Welding & Soldering Equipment             Hand & Power Tools These are the tools that should be found in every shop and household across the country. Travers has a huge inventory of Hand & Power tools. The selection includes benders, brushes, spatulas & chip removal, clamps, hacksaw frames, hammers, mallets & faces, keys & wrenches, knives, magnetic tooling, marking equipment, pin vises, pipe working applications, pliers, pneumatic power tools, power bits, power tools & accessories, pry bars, pullers, punches, punches & chisels, scissors, screwdrivers, mechanic's sets, snips, bolt cutters, cable cutters, sockets & accessories, torque tools, tweezers & probes, bench vises, wrenches, staplers & staples. We carry some of the best and most well-known brands including Craftsman, Allen, Bondhus, Starrett, OTMT, Stanley, TTC, DeWalt, Channellock, Lixie, Nupla & many more! With over 150,000 items to choose from Travers should be your #1 choice for hand & power tools.      Product Categories        Pneumatic Power Tools (265)        Hose-Air (135)        Hose (349)        Keys & Wrenches (508)        Hammers_Mallets & Faces (475)        Punches & Chisels (1273)        Clamps (193)        Vises-Bench (101)        Wrenches (1373)        Screwdrivers (378)        Sockets & Accessories (2147)        Marking Equipment (575)        Sets (63)        Torque Tools (141)        Pliers (297)        Punches (1)        Knives (62)        Power Bits (151)        Tweezers & Probes (39)        Brushes, Spatulas & Chip Removal (37)        Snips, Bolt & Cable Cutters (62)        Pin Vises (11)        Pry Bars (11)        Magnetic Tooling (5)        Hand Saws (5)        Pipe Working Applications (11)        Scissors (6)        Pullers (13)        Power Tools & Accessories (197)        Hydraulic Tools (2)                Sign Up for Exclusive Savings!       Subscribe to receive Travers emails & hear about new arrivals, special promotions and exclusive offers      Sign-Up              Request Your FREE Catalog! Over 1,800 full-color pages geared to the metalworking industry!    Request Free Catalog                                                           Welding Equipment & Apparel | Travers Tool
                        ×Close  Product Added to Your Cart        Continue Shopping     Go to Shopping Cart             ×Close  Item not Added to Cart! Please try again.        Continue Shopping              MENU                                      My Account  Sign In / Register            Phone: 800.221.0270  Fax: 800.722.0703                   Search           Cart 0 (0) – $0.00                       Home MRO Welding & Soldering Equipment       MRO      Hand & Power Tools    Fluid Power    Safety & Hygiene Supplies    Storage & Workshop Equipment    Material Handling Equipment    Adhesives, Paint & Sundries    Fasteners     Welding & Soldering Equipment              Welding & Soldering Equipment Travers Tool carries the essential equipment for welding and soldering including arc welding, portable torches, soldering and welding equipment.  Secure yourself with Travers Tool's welding protection equipment and complete your components with welding cutting oxyacetylene, brazing alloys, electrodes, and mig/tig consumables.      Product Categories        Welding Protection (128)        Arc Welding (19)        Soldering Equipment (21)        Welding Equipment (39)        Electrodes (13)        Welding Cutting Oxyacetylene (73)        Brazing Alloys (2)        Mig/Tig Consumables (37)        Portable Torches (2)                Sign Up for Exclusive Savings!       Subscribe to receive Travers emails & hear about new arrivals, special promotions and exclusive offers      Sign-Up              Request Your FREE Catalog! Over 1,800 full-color pages geared to the metalworking industry!    Request Free Catalog                                                           Metalworking Cutting Tools: High Speed Steel & Solid Carbide | Travers Tool
                        ×Close  Product Added to Your Cart        Continue Shopping     Go to Shopping Cart             ×Close  Item not Added to Cart! Please try again.        Continue Shopping              MENU                                      My Account  Sign In / Register            Phone: 800.221.0270  Fax: 800.722.0703                   Search           Cart 0 (0) – $0.00                       Home Metalworking Metal Cutting Tools: High Speed Steel & Solid Carbide       Metalworking       Metal Cutting Tools: High Speed Steel & Solid Carbide     Measuring & Inspection Tools    Machine Tool Accessories    Industrial Machinery    Indexable Cutting Tools    Abrasives, Files & Deburring Tools    Cutting Fluids & Lubricants    Tooling Components & Workholding             Metal Cutting Tools: High Speed Steel & Solid Carbide Travers Tool offers a wide range of High Speed Steel (HSS) & Solid Carbide cutting tools. We are an industry leader in the cutting tool business and have all of the tools and expertise you are looking for. Our selection of tools includes blanks & tools bits, Solid boring bars, broaches, chasers, counterbores & step drills, countersinks, dies, drills, end mills, extractors, knurls & knurling tools, milling cutters, reamers, saw blades, shell mills, slitting saws, slotting saws, circular saws, taps, tool bit holders & trepanning tools. We carry many of the top industry brands including Niagara Cutter, Starrett, Nachi, Micro100, TTC, YG-1 & more! All of these tools are made to cut and drill through your toughest applications. Travers catalog includes more than 150,000 products. With our knowledge & great customer service, Travers is the place for your cutting tool needs!      Product Categories        End Mills (29166)        Drills (23139)        Taps, Tap Extensions & Tap Wrenches (8944)        Reamers (5073)        Blanks & Tool Bits (2260)        Countersinks (2827)        Saw Blades (2603)        Trepanning Tools & Annular Cutters (1454)        Counterbores & Step Drills (676)        Milling Cutters (4060)        Slitting, Slotting, Circular Saw (2624)        Boring Bars - Solid (4427)        Broaches (480)        Dies (848)        Knurls & Knurling Tools (312)        Extractors (265)        Chasers (162)        Shell Mills (511)        Tool Bit Holders (86)                Sign Up for Exclusive Savings!       Subscribe to receive Travers emails & hear about new arrivals, special promotions and exclusive offers      Sign-Up              Request Your FREE Catalog! Over 1,800 full-color pages geared to the metalworking industry!    Request Free Catalog                                                          